Indiana, session 2026, SB278.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-15-1.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 167, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.1. (a) A taxpayer may appeal an
assessment of a taxpayer's tangible property by filing a notice in writing
with the township assessor, or the county assessor if the township is not
served by a township assessor. Except as provided in subsections (e)
and (h), an appeal under this section may raise any claim of an error
related to the following:
(1) The assessed value of the property.
(2) The assessment was against the wrong person.
(3) The approval denial or omission of a deduction, credit,
exemption, abatement, or tax cap.
(4) A clerical, mathematical, or typographical mistake.
(5) The description of the real property.
(6) The legality or constitutionality of a property tax or
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


assessment.
A written notice under this section must be made on a form designated
by the department of local government finance. A taxpayer must file a
separate petition for each parcel.
(b) A taxpayer may appeal an error in the assessed value of the
property under subsection (a)(1) any time after the official's action, but
not later than the following:
(1) For assessments before January 1, 2019, the earlier of:
(A) forty-five (45) days after the date on which the notice of
assessment is mailed by the county; or
(B) forty-five (45) days after the date on which the tax
statement is mailed by the county treasurer, regardless of
whether the assessing official changes the taxpayer's
assessment.
(2) For assessments of real property, after December 31, 2018, the
earlier of:
(A) June 15 of the assessment year, if the notice of assessment
is mailed by the county before May 1 of the assessment year;
or
(B) June 15 of the year in which the tax statement is mailed by
the county treasurer, if the notice of assessment is mailed by
the county on or after May 1 of the assessment year.
(3) For assessments of personal property, forty-five (45) days after
the date on which the county mails the notice under
IC 6-1.1-3-20.
A taxpayer may appeal an error in the assessment under subsection
(a)(2), (a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(5), or (a)(6) not later than three (3) years after
the taxes were first due.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), an appeal under this
section applies only to the tax year corresponding to the tax statement
or other notice of action.
(d) An appeal under this section applies to a prior tax year if a
county official took action regarding a prior tax year, and such action
is reflected for the first time in the tax statement. A taxpayer who has
timely filed a written notice of appeal under this section may be
required to file a petition for each tax year, and each petition filed later
must be considered timely.
(e) A taxpayer may not appeal under this section any claim of error
related to the following:
(1) The denial of a deduction, exemption, abatement, or credit if
the authority to approve or deny is not vested in the county board,
county auditor, county assessor, or township assessor.
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(2) The calculation of interest and penalties.
(3) A matter under subsection (a) if a separate appeal or review
process is statutorily prescribed.
However, a claim may be raised under this section regarding the
omission or application of a deduction approved by an authority other
than the county board, county auditor, county assessor, or township
assessor.
(f) The filing of a written notice under this section constitutes a
request by the taxpayer for a preliminary informal meeting with the
township assessor, or the county assessor if the township is not served
by a township assessor.
(g) A county or township official who receives a written notice
under this section shall forward the notice to:
(1) the county board; and
(2) the county auditor, if the taxpayer raises a claim regarding a
matter that is in the discretion of the county auditor.
(h) A taxpayer may not raise any claim in an appeal under this
section related to the legality or constitutionality of:
(1) a user fee (as defined in IC 33-23-1-10.5);
(2) any other charge, fee, or rate imposed by a political
subdivision under any other law; or
(3) any tax imposed by a political subdivision other than a
property tax.
(i) This subsection applies only to an appeal based on a claim of
error in the determination of property that is or is not eligible for a
standard homestead deduction under IC 6-1.1-12-37 and only for an
assessment date occurring before January 1, 2024. A taxpayer may
appeal an error in the assessment of property as described in this
subsection any time after the official's action, but not later than one (1)
year after the date on which the property that is the subject of the
appeal was assessed.
(j) In an appeal of the assessed value of a property:
(1) the county or township assessor in conjunction with the
preliminary informal meeting; or
(2) the county board in conjunction with an appeal hearing by
the county board may request a taxpayer to provide income
data necessary to determine the assessed value under the
income capitalization approach. If requested, a taxpayer shall
provide income data within sixty (60) days of the request.
SECTION 2. IC 6-3.6-4-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.243-2015,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) If there are bonds or leases outstanding that
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


are payable from a tax imposed under IC 6-3.5-1.1 (before its repeal
January 1, 2017), IC 6-3.5-6 (before its repeal January 1, 2017),
IC 6-3.5-7 (before its repeal January 1, 2017), IC 6-3.6-6, or IC 6-3.6-7
(but not IC 6-3.6-5), the adopting body may not reduce the tax rate
below a rate that would produce one and twenty-five hundredths (1.25)
times the total of the highest annual outstanding debt service plus the
highest annual lease payments plus any amount required under the
agreements for the bonds or leases to be deposited in a sinking fund or
other reserve, unless:
(1) the adopting body; or
(2) any city, town, or county;
pledges all or a part of its share of revenues from the tax imposed under
IC 6-3.6-6 or IC 6-3.6-7 (but not IC 6-3.6-5) for the life of the bonds or
the term of the lease, in an amount that is sufficient, when combined
with the amount pledged by the city, town, or county that issued the
bonds, to produce one and twenty-five hundredths (1.25) times the total
of the highest annual outstanding debt service plus the highest annual
lease payments plus the amount required under the agreements for the
bonds or leases to be deposited in a sinking fund or other reserve.
(b) An adopting body must annually, on or before November 10,
report to the department of local government finance, in a manner
determined by the department of local government finance:
(1) the total amount of debt outstanding;
(2) the annual amount of debt due for each remaining year the
debt will be outstanding; and
(3) the estimated payoff year for all debt backed by the local
income tax. An adopting body shall provide an indication of
all debt obligations outstanding that are not supported by any
secondary backing source.
(c) The department of local government finance shall post the
information required under subsection (b) on the department's
computer gateway.
SECTION 3. IC 6-3.6-4-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 115, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 3. (a) If there are bonds or
leases outstanding that are payable from a tax imposed under
IC 6-3.5-1.1 (before its repeal January 1, 2017), IC 6-3.5-6 (before its
repeal January 1, 2017), IC 6-3.5-7 (before its repeal January 1, 2017),
IC 6-3.6-6, or IC 6-3.6-7, the adopting body may not reduce the tax rate
below a rate that would produce one and twenty-five hundredths (1.25)
times the total of the highest annual outstanding debt service plus the
highest annual lease payments plus any amount required under the
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


agreements for the bonds or leases to be deposited in a sinking fund or
other reserve, unless:
(1) the adopting body; or
(2) any city, town, or county;
pledges all or a part of its share of revenues from the tax imposed under
IC 6-3.6-6 or IC 6-3.6-7 for the life of the bonds or the term of the
lease, in an amount that is sufficient, when combined with the amount
pledged by the city, town, or county that issued the bonds, to produce
one and twenty-five hundredths (1.25) times the total of the highest
annual outstanding debt service plus the highest annual lease payments
plus the amount required under the agreements for the bonds or leases
to be deposited in a sinking fund or other reserve.
(b) An adopting body must annually, on or before November 10,
report to the department of local government finance, in a manner
determined by the department of local government finance:
(1) the total amount of debt outstanding;
(2) the annual amount of debt due for each remaining year the
debt will be outstanding; and
(3) the estimated payoff year for all debt backed by the local
income tax. An adopting body shall provide an indication of
all debt obligations outstanding that are not supported by any
secondary backing source.
(c) The department of local government finance shall post the
information required under subsection (b) on the department's
computer gateway.
SECTION 4. IC 8-22-3.5-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.174-2022,
SECTION 50, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) As used in this section, "base assessed
value" means, subject to subsection (k):
(1) the net assessed value of all the tangible property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the commission's
resolution adopted under section 5 or 9.5 of this chapter,
notwithstanding the date of the final action taken under section 6
of this chapter; plus
(2) to the extent it is not included in subdivision (1), the net
assessed value of property that is assessed as residential property
under the rules of the department of local government finance,
within the airport development zone, as finally determined for the
current assessment date.
However, subdivision (2) applies only to an airport development zone
established after June 30, 1997, and the portion of an airport
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


development zone established before June 30, 1997, that is added to an
existing airport development zone.
(b) A resolution adopted under section 5 of this chapter and
confirmed under section 6 of this chapter must include a provision with
respect to the allocation and distribution of property taxes for the
purposes and in the manner provided in this section.
(c) The allocation provision must:
(1) apply to the entire airport development zone; and
(2) require that any property tax on taxable tangible property
subsequently levied by or for the benefit of any public body
entitled to a distribution of property taxes in the airport
development zone be allocated and distributed as provided in
subsections (d) and (e).
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this section:
(1) the proceeds of the taxes attributable to the lesser of:
(A) the assessed value of the tangible property for the
assessment date with respect to which the allocation and
distribution is made; or
(B) the base assessed value;
shall be allocated and, when collected, paid into the funds of the
respective taxing units; and
(2) the excess of the proceeds of the property taxes imposed for
the assessment date with respect to which the allocation and
distribution are made that are attributable to taxes imposed after
being approved by the voters in a referendum or local public
question conducted after April 30, 2010, not otherwise included
in subdivision (1) shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid
into the funds of the taxing unit for which the referendum or local
public question was conducted.
(e) All of the property tax proceeds in excess of those described in
subsection (d) shall be allocated to the eligible entity for the airport
development zone and, when collected, paid into special funds as
follows:
(1) The commission may determine that a portion of tax proceeds
shall be allocated to a training grant fund to be expended by the
commission without appropriation solely for the purpose of
reimbursing training expenses incurred by public or private
entities in the training of employees for the qualified airport
development project.
(2) The commission may determine that a portion of tax proceeds
shall be allocated to a debt service fund and dedicated to the
payment of principal and interest on revenue bonds or a loan
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


contract of the board of aviation commissioners or airport
authority for a qualified airport development project, to the
payment of leases for a qualified airport development project, or
to the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued by an
eligible entity to pay for qualified airport development projects in
the airport development zone or serving the airport development
zone.
(3) The commission may determine that a part of the tax proceeds
shall be allocated to a project fund and used to pay expenses
incurred by the commission for a qualified airport development
project that is in the airport development zone or is serving the
airport development zone.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (f), all remaining tax
proceeds after allocations are made under subdivisions (1), (2),
and (3) shall be allocated to a project fund and dedicated to the
reimbursement of expenditures made by the commission for a
qualified airport development project that is in the airport
development zone or is serving the airport development zone.
(f) Before July 15 of each year, the commission shall do the
following:
(1) Determine the amount, if any, by which tax proceeds allocated
to the project fund in subsection (e)(3) in the following year will
exceed the amount necessary to satisfy amounts required under
subsection (e).
(2) Provide a written notice to the county auditor and the officers
who are authorized to fix budgets, tax rates, and tax levies under
IC 6-1.1-17-5 for each of the other taxing units that is wholly or
partly located within the allocation area. The notice must:
(A) state the amount, if any, of excess tax proceeds that the
commission has determined may be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subsection (d)(1); or
(B) state that the commission has determined that there are no
excess tax proceeds that may be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subsection (d)(1).
The county auditor shall allocate to the respective taxing units the
amount, if any, of excess tax proceeds determined by the
commission.
(g) When money in the debt service fund and in the project fund is
sufficient to pay all outstanding principal and interest (to the earliest
date on which the obligations can be redeemed) on revenue bonds
issued by the board of aviation commissioners or airport authority for
the financing of qualified airport development projects, all lease rentals
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


payable on leases of qualified airport development projects, and all
costs and expenditures associated with all qualified airport
development projects, money in the debt service fund and in the project
fund in excess of those amounts shall be paid to the respective taxing
units in the manner prescribed by subsection (d)(1).
(h) Property tax proceeds allocable to the debt service fund under
subsection (e)(2) must, subject to subsection (g), be irrevocably
pledged by the eligible entity for the purpose set forth in subsection
(e)(2).
(i) Notwithstanding any other law, each assessor shall, upon petition
of the commission, reassess the taxable tangible property situated upon
or in, or added to, the airport development zone effective on the next
assessment date after the petition.
(j) Notwithstanding any other law, the assessed value of all taxable
tangible property in the airport development zone, for purposes of tax
limitation, property tax replacement, and formulation of the budget, tax
rate, and tax levy for each political subdivision in which the property
is located is the lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the tangible property as valued without
regard to this section; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(k) If the commission confirms, or modifies and confirms, a
resolution under section 6 of this chapter and the commission makes
either of the filings required under section 6(c) of this chapter after the
first anniversary of the effective date of the allocation provision, the
auditor of the county in which the airport development zone is located
shall compute the base assessed value for the allocation area using the
assessment date immediately preceding the later of:
(1) the date on which the documents are filed with the county
auditor; or
(2) the date on which the documents are filed with the department
of local government finance.
(l) For an airport development zone established after June 30, 2024,
"residential property" refers to the assessed value of property that is
allocated to the one percent (1%) homestead land and improvement
categories in the county tax and billing software system. along with the
residential assessed value as defined for purposes of calculating the
rate for the local income tax property tax relief credit designated for
residential property under IC 6-3.6-5-6(d)(3).
SECTION 5. IC 8-22-3.5-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 196, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9. (a) As used in this section, "base
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


assessed value" means, subject to subsection (k):
(1) the net assessed value of all the tangible property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the commission's
resolution adopted under section 5 or 9.5 of this chapter,
notwithstanding the date of the final action taken under section 6
of this chapter; plus
(2) to the extent it is not included in subdivision (1), the net
assessed value of property that is assessed as residential property
under the rules of the department of local government finance,
within the airport development zone, as finally determined for the
current assessment date.
However, subdivision (2) applies only to an airport development zone
established after June 30, 1997, and the portion of an airport
development zone established before June 30, 1997, that is added to an
existing airport development zone.
(b) A resolution adopted under section 5 of this chapter and
confirmed under section 6 of this chapter must include a provision with
respect to the allocation and distribution of property taxes for the
purposes and in the manner provided in this section.
(c) The allocation provision must:
(1) apply to the entire airport development zone; and
(2) require that any property tax on taxable tangible property
subsequently levied by or for the benefit of any public body
entitled to a distribution of property taxes in the airport
development zone be allocated and distributed as provided in
subsections (d) and (e).
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this section:
(1) the proceeds of the taxes attributable to the lesser of:
(A) the assessed value of the tangible property for the
assessment date with respect to which the allocation and
distribution is made; or
(B) the base assessed value;
shall be allocated and, when collected, paid into the funds of the
respective taxing units; and
(2) the excess of the proceeds of the property taxes imposed for
the assessment date with respect to which the allocation and
distribution are made that are attributable to taxes imposed after
being approved by the voters in a referendum or local public
question conducted after April 30, 2010, not otherwise included
in subdivision (1) shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid
into the funds of the taxing unit for which the referendum or local
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


public question was conducted.
(e) All of the property tax proceeds in excess of those described in
subsection (d) shall be allocated to the eligible entity for the airport
development zone and, when collected, paid into special funds as
follows:
(1) The commission may determine that a portion of tax proceeds
shall be allocated to a training grant fund to be expended by the
commission without appropriation solely for the purpose of
reimbursing training expenses incurred by public or private
entities in the training of employees for the qualified airport
development project.
(2) The commission may determine that a portion of tax proceeds
shall be allocated to a debt service fund and dedicated to the
payment of principal and interest on revenue bonds or a loan
contract of the board of aviation commissioners or airport
authority for a qualified airport development project, to the
payment of leases for a qualified airport development project, or
to the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued by an
eligible entity to pay for qualified airport development projects in
the airport development zone or serving the airport development
zone.
(3) The commission may determine that a part of the tax proceeds
shall be allocated to a project fund and used to pay expenses
incurred by the commission for a qualified airport development
project that is in the airport development zone or is serving the
airport development zone.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (f), all remaining tax
proceeds after allocations are made under subdivisions (1), (2),
and (3) shall be allocated to a project fund and dedicated to the
reimbursement of expenditures made by the commission for a
qualified airport development project that is in the airport
development zone or is serving the airport development zone.
(f) Before July 15 of each year, the commission shall do the
following:
(1) Determine the amount, if any, by which tax proceeds allocated
to the project fund in subsection (e)(3) in the following year will
exceed the amount necessary to satisfy amounts required under
subsection (e).
(2) Provide a written notice to the county auditor and the officers
who are authorized to fix budgets, tax rates, and tax levies under
IC 6-1.1-17-5 for each of the other taxing units that is wholly or
partly located within the allocation area. The notice must:
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(A) state the amount, if any, of excess tax proceeds that the
commission has determined may be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subsection (d)(1); or
(B) state that the commission has determined that there are no
excess tax proceeds that may be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subsection (d)(1).
The county auditor shall allocate to the respective taxing units the
amount, if any, of excess tax proceeds determined by the
commission.
(g) When money in the debt service fund and in the project fund is
sufficient to pay all outstanding principal and interest (to the earliest
date on which the obligations can be redeemed) on revenue bonds
issued by the board of aviation commissioners or airport authority for
the financing of qualified airport development projects, all lease rentals
payable on leases of qualified airport development projects, and all
costs and expenditures associated with all qualified airport
development projects, money in the debt service fund and in the project
fund in excess of those amounts shall be paid to the respective taxing
units in the manner prescribed by subsection (d)(1).
(h) Property tax proceeds allocable to the debt service fund under
subsection (e)(2) must, subject to subsection (g), be irrevocably
pledged by the eligible entity for the purpose set forth in subsection
(e)(2).
(i) Notwithstanding any other law, each assessor shall, upon petition
of the commission, reassess the taxable tangible property situated upon
or in, or added to, the airport development zone effective on the next
assessment date after the petition.
(j) Notwithstanding any other law, the assessed value of all taxable
tangible property in the airport development zone, for purposes of tax
limitation, property tax replacement, and formulation of the budget, tax
rate, and tax levy for each political subdivision in which the property
is located is the lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the tangible property as valued without
regard to this section; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(k) If the commission confirms, or modifies and confirms, a
resolution under section 6 of this chapter and the commission makes
either of the filings required under section 6(c) of this chapter after the
first anniversary of the effective date of the allocation provision, the
auditor of the county in which the airport development zone is located
shall compute the base assessed value for the allocation area using the
assessment date immediately preceding the later of:
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(1) the date on which the documents are filed with the county
auditor; or
(2) the date on which the documents are filed with the department
of local government finance.
(l) For an airport development zone established after June 30, 2024,
"residential property" refers to the assessed value of property that is
allocated to the one percent (1%) homestead land and improvement
categories in the county tax and billing software system. along with the
residential assessed value as defined for purposes of calculating the
rate for the local income tax property tax relief credit designated for
residential property under IC 6-3.6-5-6(d)(3) (before its expiration).
SECTION 6. IC 8-22-3.5-9.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.123-2024,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9.3. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if the
Indiana economic development corporation subsequently designates
territory that is located in an existing allocation area under this chapter
as an innovation development district under IC 36-7-32.5, the
allocation area may not be renewed or extended under this chapter until
the term of the innovation development district expires.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, for taxing districts that
include multiple tax increment financing districts under this
chapter, the original tax increment financing district does not
expire and stays active only for the purpose of satisfying
outstanding bonds issued by the subsequent tax increment
financing district, only if the commission completes the following
requirements:
(1) Provides a written appeal to and receives the approval of
the department of local government finance.
(2) Provides written notice to the state board of accounts of
the appeal.
SECTION 7. IC 8-22-3.5-9.8, AS ADDED BY P.L.249-2015,
SECTION 23, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9.8. (a) A commission may enter into a written
agreement with a taxpayer who owns, or is otherwise obligated to pay
property taxes on, tangible property that is or will be located in an
allocation area established under this chapter in which the taxpayer
waives review of any assessment of the taxpayer's tangible property
that is located in the allocation area for an assessment date that occurs
during the term of any specified bond or lease obligations that are
payable from property taxes in accordance with an allocation provision
for the allocation area and any applicable statute, ordinance, or
resolution. An agreement described in this section may precede the
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


establishment of the allocation area or the determination to issue bonds
or enter into leases payable from the allocated property taxes.
(b) The original owner of each nonowner-occupied residential
property subject to the two percent (2%) tax cap, that is located in
the tax increment financing area and is excluded from the base
assessed value, shall upon completion of construction enter into a
written agreement with the commission indicating the owner shall
be obligated to pay the property tax for the portion of outstanding
bonds in the tax increment financing district attributable to the
property until the term length of the original outstanding bond is
retired. The written agreement with the commission shall be
considered a lien on the property and shall be included as part of
the residential real estate sales disclosure under IC 32-21-5. If the
property is subsequently sold as a homestead property and
becomes subject to the one percent (1%) tax cap, the new owner
shall be responsible for the lien on the property attributable to the
written agreement with the commission, and the new homestead
property owner shall be obligated to fulfill the terms of the written
agreement including the payment of the property tax liability
included in the agreement.
SECTION 8. IC 8-22-3.5-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.86-2018,
SECTION 144, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) The state board of accounts
and the department of local government finance shall make the rules
and prescribe the forms and procedures that the state board of accounts
and department consider appropriate for the implementation of this
chapter.
(b) After each reassessment under IC 6-1.1-4, the department of
local government finance shall adjust the base assessed value (as
defined in section 9 of this chapter) one (1) time to neutralize any effect
of the reassessment on the property tax proceeds allocated to the airport
development zone's special funds under section 9 of this chapter.
(c) After each annual adjustment under IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, the
department of local government finance shall adjust the base assessed
value (as defined in section 9 of this chapter) to neutralize any effect
of the annual adjustment on the property tax proceeds allocated to the
airport development zone's special funds under section 9 of this
chapter.
(d) The department of local government finance may require the
commission to submit required documentation to neutralize the
base assessed value under subsection (c). Any supporting
documentation the commission is required to submit to support the
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


base assessed value neutralization calculation must be completed
and submitted to the department of local government finance by
July 15 of each year.
(e) If the commission does not submit the required
documentation under subsection (d) by the deadline described in
subsection (d) in a given year, then five percent (5%) of the excess
assessed value shall be allocated to the respective taxing units in
the manner prescribed by section 9(d)(1) of this chapter in the year
the deadline described in subsection (d) is missed.
SECTION 9. IC 32-21-5-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 166, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The Indiana real estate
commission established by IC 25-34.1-2-1 shall adopt a specific
disclosure form that contains the following:
(1) Disclosure by the owner of the known condition of the
following:
(A) The foundation.
(B) The mechanical systems.
(C) The roof.
(D) The structure.
(E) The water and sewer systems.
(F) Additions that may require improvements to the sewage
disposal system.
(G) Other areas that the Indiana real estate commission
determines are appropriate.
(2) Disclosure by the owner of known:
(A) contamination caused by the manufacture of a controlled
substance (as defined by IC 35-48-1.1-7) on the property that
has not been certified as decontaminated by a qualified
inspector who is certified under IC 16-19-3.1; or
(B) manufacture of methamphetamine or dumping of waste
from the manufacture of methamphetamine in a residential
structure on the property.
(3) A notice to the prospective buyer that contains substantially
the following language:
"The prospective buyer and the owner may wish to obtain
professional advice or inspections of the property and provide for
appropriate provisions in a contract between them concerning any
advice, inspections, defects, or warranties obtained on the
property.".
(4) A notice to the prospective buyer that contains substantially
the following language:
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


"The representations in this form are the representations of the
owner and are not the representations of the agent, if any. This
information is for disclosure only and is not intended to be a part
of any contract between the buyer and owner.".
(5) A disclosure by the owner that an airport is located within a
geographical distance from the property as determined by the
Indiana real estate commission. The commission may consider the
differences between an airport serving commercial airlines and an
airport that does not serve commercial airlines in determining the
distance to be disclosed.
(6) A disclosure by the owner that:
(A) the property is located near a military installation, within
a state area of interest (as defined in IC 36-7-30.2-6), and may
be impacted to some degree by the effects of the installation's
military operations; and
(B) local laws may restrict use and development of the
property to promote compatibility with military installation
operations.
(7) If the owner has personal knowledge of the fact that all or a
portion of the real estate is located within a community's flood
plain boundaries, as indicated in a Federal Emergency
Management Agency Flood Insurance Rate Map, a disclosure by
the owner of that fact.
(8) A disclosure by the owner that the property is located within
a locally designated historic district under IC 36-7-11.
(9) A disclosure by the owner of a conservation easement (as
defined in IC 32-23-5-2).
(10) A disclosure by the owner if the property has a lien
pursuant to a written agreement with a redevelopment
commission or reuse authority under any of the following:
(A) IC 8-22-3.5-9.8(b).
(B) IC 36-7-14-39.6(b).
(C) IC 36-7-15.1-26.6(b).
(D) IC 36-7-30-26.5(b).
(E) IC 36-7-30.5-31.5(b).
(b) Responsibility for the disclosure required under subsection
(a)(6) rests solely with the owner of the property and no liability for the
owner's failure to make the required disclosure shall accrue to any third
party. Failure of the owner to make the required disclosure under
subsection (a)(6) shall not:
(1) invalidate the transfer of the property; or
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(2) create any encumbrance or lien upon any legal or equitable
title to the property.
SECTION 10. IC 36-7-14-39, AS AMENDED BY P.L.181-2025,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 39. (a) As used in this section:
"Allocation area" means that part of a redevelopment project area
to which an allocation provision of a declaratory resolution adopted
under section 15 of this chapter refers for purposes of distribution and
allocation of property taxes.
"Base assessed value" means, subject to subsection (j), the
following:
(1) If an allocation provision is adopted after June 30, 1995, in a
declaratory resolution or an amendment to a declaratory
resolution establishing an economic development area:
(A) the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(B) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A), the net
assessed value of property that is assessed as residential
property under the rules of the department of local government
finance, within the allocation area, as finally determined for
the current assessment date.
(2) If an allocation provision is adopted after June 30, 1997, in a
declaratory resolution or an amendment to a declaratory
resolution establishing a redevelopment project area:
(A) the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(B) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A), the net
assessed value of property that is assessed as residential
property under the rules of the department of local government
finance, as finally determined for the current assessment date.
(3) If:
(A) an allocation provision adopted before June 30, 1995, in
a declaratory resolution or an amendment to a declaratory
resolution establishing a redevelopment project area expires
after June 30, 1997; and
(B) after June 30, 1997, a new allocation provision is included
in an amendment to the declaratory resolution;
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


the net assessed value of all the property as finally determined for
the assessment date immediately preceding the effective date of
the allocation provision adopted after June 30, 1997, as adjusted
under subsection (h).
(4) Except as provided in subdivision (5), for all other allocation
areas, the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h).
(5) If an allocation area established in an economic development
area before July 1, 1995, is expanded after June 30, 1995, the
definition in subdivision (1) applies to the expanded part of the
area added after June 30, 1995.
(6) If an allocation area established in a redevelopment project
area before July 1, 1997, is expanded after June 30, 1997, the
definition in subdivision (2) applies to the expanded part of the
area added after June 30, 1997.
Except as provided in section 39.3 of this chapter, "property taxes"
means taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on real property. However, upon
approval by a resolution of the redevelopment commission adopted
before June 1, 1987, "property taxes" also includes taxes imposed
under IC 6-1.1 on depreciable personal property. If a redevelopment
commission adopted before June 1, 1987, a resolution to include within
the definition of property taxes, taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on
depreciable personal property that has a useful life in excess of eight
(8) years, the commission may by resolution determine the percentage
of taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on all depreciable personal property
that will be included within the definition of property taxes. However,
the percentage included must not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of
the taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on all depreciable personal property.
(b) A declaratory resolution adopted under section 15 of this chapter
on or before the allocation deadline determined under subsection (i)
may include a provision with respect to the allocation and distribution
of property taxes for the purposes and in the manner provided in this
section. A declaratory resolution previously adopted may include an
allocation provision by the amendment of that declaratory resolution on
or before the allocation deadline determined under subsection (i) in
accordance with the procedures required for its original adoption. A
declaratory resolution or amendment that establishes an allocation
provision must include a specific finding of fact, supported by
evidence, that the adoption of the allocation provision will result in
new property taxes in the area that would not have been generated but
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


for the adoption of the allocation provision. For an allocation area
established before July 1, 1995, the expiration date of any allocation
provisions for the allocation area is June 30, 2025, or the last date of
any obligations that are outstanding on July 1, 2015, whichever is later.
A declaratory resolution or an amendment that establishes an allocation
provision after June 30, 1995, must specify an expiration date for the
allocation provision. For an allocation area established before July 1,
2008, the expiration date may not be more than thirty (30) years after
the date on which the allocation provision is established. For an
allocation area established after June 30, 2008, the expiration date may
not be more than twenty-five (25) years after the date on which the first
obligation was incurred to pay principal and interest on bonds or lease
rentals on leases payable from tax increment revenues. However, with
respect to bonds or other obligations that were issued before July 1,
2008, if any of the bonds or other obligations that were scheduled when
issued to mature before the specified expiration date and that are
payable only from allocated tax proceeds with respect to the allocation
area remain outstanding as of the expiration date, the allocation
provision does not expire until all of the bonds or other obligations are
no longer outstanding. Notwithstanding any other law, in the case of an
allocation area that is established after June 30, 2019, and that is
located in a redevelopment project area described in section
25.1(c)(3)(C) of this chapter, an economic development area described
in section 25.1(c)(3)(C) of this chapter, or an urban renewal project
area described in section 25.1(c)(3)(C) of this chapter, the expiration
date of the allocation provision may not be more than thirty-five (35)
years after the date on which the allocation provision is established.
The allocation provision may apply to all or part of the redevelopment
project area. The allocation provision must require that any property
taxes subsequently levied by or for the benefit of any public body
entitled to a distribution of property taxes on taxable property in the
allocation area be allocated and distributed as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the proceeds of
the taxes attributable to the lesser of:
(A) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date
with respect to which the allocation and distribution is made;
or
(B) the base assessed value;
shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into the funds of
the respective taxing units.
(2) This subdivision applies to a fire protection territory
established after December 31, 2022. If a unit becomes a
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


participating unit of a fire protection territory that is established
after a declaratory resolution is adopted under section 15 of this
chapter, the excess of the proceeds of the property taxes
attributable to an increase in the property tax rate for the
participating unit of a fire protection territory:
(A) except as otherwise provided by this subdivision, shall be
determined as follows:
STEP ONE: Divide the unit's tax rate for fire protection for
the year before the establishment of the fire protection
territory by the participating unit's tax rate as part of the fire
protection territory.
STEP TWO: Subtract the STEP ONE amount from one (1).
STEP THREE: Multiply the STEP TWO amount by the
allocated property tax attributable to the participating unit of
the fire protection territory; and
(B) to the extent not otherwise included in subdivisions (1)
and (3), the amount determined under STEP THREE of clause
(A) shall be allocated to and distributed in the form of an
allocated property tax revenue pass back to the participating
unit of the fire protection territory for the assessment date with
respect to which the allocation is made.
However, if the redevelopment commission determines that it is
unable to meet its debt service obligations with regards to the
allocation area without all or part of the allocated property tax
revenue pass back to the participating unit of a fire protection area
under this subdivision, then the allocated property tax revenue
pass back under this subdivision shall be reduced by the amount
necessary for the redevelopment commission to meet its debt
service obligations of the allocation area. The calculation under
this subdivision must be made by the redevelopment commission
in collaboration with the county auditor and the applicable fire
protection territory. Any calculation determined according to
clause (A) must be submitted to the department of local
government finance in the manner prescribed by the department
of local government finance. The department of local government
finance shall verify the accuracy of each calculation.
(3) The excess of the proceeds of the property taxes imposed for
the assessment date with respect to which the allocation and
distribution is made that are attributable to taxes imposed after
being approved by the voters in a referendum or local public
question conducted after April 30, 2010, not otherwise included
in subdivisions (1) and (2) shall be allocated to and, when
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


collected, paid into the funds of the taxing unit for which the
referendum or local public question was conducted.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section, property tax
proceeds in excess of those described in subdivisions (1), (2), and
(3) shall be allocated to the redevelopment district and, when
collected, paid into an allocation fund for that allocation area that
may be used by the redevelopment district only to do one (1) or
more of the following:
(A) Pay the principal of and interest on any obligations
payable solely from allocated tax proceeds which are incurred
by the redevelopment district for the purpose of financing or
refinancing the redevelopment of that allocation area.
(B) Establish, augment, or restore the debt service reserve for
bonds payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in
that allocation area.
(C) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds payable from
allocated tax proceeds in that allocation area and from the
special tax levied under section 27 of this chapter.
(D) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued by the
unit to pay for local public improvements that are physically
located in or physically connected to that allocation area.
(E) Pay premiums on the redemption before maturity of bonds
payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in that
allocation area.
(F) Make payments on leases payable from allocated tax
proceeds in that allocation area under section 25.2 of this
chapter.
(G) Reimburse the unit for expenditures made by it for local
public improvements (which include buildings, parking
facilities, and other items described in section 25.1(a) of this
chapter) that are physically located in or physically connected
to that allocation area.
(H) Reimburse the unit for rentals paid by it for a building or
parking facility that is physically located in or physically
connected to that allocation area under any lease entered into
under IC 36-1-10.
(I) For property taxes first due and payable before January 1,
2009, pay all or a part of a property tax replacement credit to
taxpayers in an allocation area as determined by the
redevelopment commission. This credit equals the amount
determined under the following STEPS for each taxpayer in a
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


taxing district (as defined in IC 6-1.1-1-20) that contains all or
part of the allocation area:
STEP ONE: Determine that part of the sum of the amounts
under IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(1)(A), IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(2),
IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(3), IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(4), and
IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(5) (before their repeal) that is attributable to
the taxing district.
STEP TWO: Divide:
(i) that part of each county's eligible property tax
replacement amount (as defined in IC 6-1.1-21-2 (before its
repeal)) for that year as determined under IC 6-1.1-21-4
(before its repeal) that is attributable to the taxing district;
by
(ii) the STEP ONE sum.
STEP THREE: Multiply:
(i) the STEP TWO quotient; times
(ii) the total amount of the taxpayer's taxes (as defined in
IC 6-1.1-21-2 (before its repeal)) levied in the taxing district
that have been allocated during that year to an allocation
fund under this section.
If not all the taxpayers in an allocation area receive the credit
in full, each taxpayer in the allocation area is entitled to
receive the same proportion of the credit. A taxpayer may not
receive a credit under this section and a credit under section
39.5 of this chapter (before its repeal) in the same year.
(J) Pay expenses incurred by the redevelopment commission
for local public improvements that are in the allocation area or
serving the allocation area. Public improvements include
buildings, parking facilities, and other items described in
section 25.1(a) of this chapter.
(K) Reimburse public and private entities for expenses
incurred in training employees of industrial facilities that are
located:
(i) in the allocation area; and
(ii) on a parcel of real property that has been classified as
industrial property under the rules of the department of local
government finance.
However, the total amount of money spent for this purpose in
any year may not exceed the total amount of money in the
allocation fund that is attributable to property taxes paid by the
industrial facilities described in this clause. The
reimbursements under this clause must be made within three
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(3) years after the date on which the investments that are the
basis for the increment financing are made.
(L) Pay the costs of carrying out an eligible efficiency project
(as defined in IC 36-9-41-1.5) within the unit that established
the redevelopment commission. However, property tax
proceeds may be used under this clause to pay the costs of
carrying out an eligible efficiency project only if those
property tax proceeds exceed the amount necessary to do the
following:
(i) Make, when due, any payments required under clauses
(A) through (K), including any payments of principal and
interest on bonds and other obligations payable under this
subdivision, any payments of premiums under this
subdivision on the redemption before maturity of bonds, and
any payments on leases payable under this subdivision.
(ii) Make any reimbursements required under this
subdivision.
(iii) Pay any expenses required under this subdivision.
(iv) Establish, augment, or restore any debt service reserve
under this subdivision.
(M) Expend money and provide financial assistance as
authorized in section 12.2(a)(27) of this chapter.
(N) Expend revenues that are allocated for police and fire
services on both capital expenditures and operating expenses
as authorized in section 12.2(a)(28) of this chapter.
The allocation fund may not be used for operating expenses of the
commission.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (g), before June 15 of each
year, the commission shall do the following:
(A) Determine the amount, if any, by which the assessed value
of the taxable property in the allocation area for the most
recent assessment date minus the base assessed value, when
multiplied by the estimated tax rate of the allocation area, will
exceed the amount of assessed value needed to produce the
property taxes necessary to make, when due, principal and
interest payments on bonds described in subdivision (4), plus
the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (4).
(B) Provide a written notice to the county auditor, the fiscal
body of the county or municipality that established the
department of redevelopment, and the officers who are
authorized to fix budgets, tax rates, and tax levies under
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


IC 6-1.1-17-5 for each of the other taxing units that is wholly
or partly located within the allocation area. The county auditor,
upon receiving the notice, shall forward this notice (in an
electronic format) to the department of local government
finance not later than June 15 of each year. The notice must:
(i) state the amount, if any, of excess assessed value that the
commission has determined may be allocated to the
respective taxing units in the manner prescribed in
subdivision (1); or
(ii) state that the commission has determined that there is no
excess assessed value that may be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1).
The county auditor shall allocate to the respective taxing units
the amount, if any, of excess assessed value determined by the
commission. The commission may not authorize an allocation
of assessed value to the respective taxing units under this
subdivision if to do so would endanger the interests of the
holders of bonds described in subdivision (4) or lessors under
section 25.3 of this chapter.
(C) If:
(i) the amount of excess assessed value determined by the
commission is expected to generate more than two hundred
percent (200%) of the amount of allocated tax proceeds
necessary to make, when due, principal and interest
payments on bonds described in subdivision (4); plus
(ii) the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (4);
the commission shall submit to the legislative body of the unit
its determination of the excess assessed value that the
commission proposes to allocate to the respective taxing units
in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1). The legislative
body of the unit may approve the commission's determination
or modify the amount of the excess assessed value that will be
allocated to the respective taxing units in the manner
prescribed in subdivision (1).
(6) Notwithstanding subdivision (5), in the case of an allocation
area that is established after June 30, 2019, and that is located in
a redevelopment project area described in section 25.1(c)(3)(C)
of this chapter, an economic development area described in
section 25.1(c)(3)(C) of this chapter, or an urban renewal project
area described in section 25.1(c)(3)(C) of this chapter, for each
year the allocation provision is in effect, if the amount of excess
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


assessed value determined by the commission under subdivision
(5)(A) is expected to generate more than two hundred percent
(200%) of:
(A) the amount of allocated tax proceeds necessary to make,
when due, principal and interest payments on bonds described
in subdivision (4) for the project; plus
(B) the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (4) for the project;
the amount of the excess assessed value that generates more than
two hundred percent (200%) of the amounts described in clauses
(A) and (B) shall be allocated to the respective taxing units in the
manner prescribed by subdivision (1).
(c) For the purpose of allocating taxes levied by or for any taxing
unit or units, the assessed value of taxable property in a territory in the
allocation area that is annexed by any taxing unit after the effective
date of the allocation provision of the declaratory resolution is the
lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date with
respect to which the allocation and distribution is made; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(d) Property tax proceeds allocable to the redevelopment district
under subsection (b)(4) may, subject to subsection (b)(5), be
irrevocably pledged by the redevelopment district for payment as set
forth in subsection (b)(4).
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, each assessor shall, upon
petition of the redevelopment commission, reassess the taxable
property situated upon or in, or added to, the allocation area, effective
on the next assessment date after the petition.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the assessed value of all taxable
property in the allocation area, for purposes of tax limitation, property
tax replacement, and formulation of the budget, tax rate, and tax levy
for each political subdivision in which the property is located is the
lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property as valued without regard to
this section; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(g) If any part of the allocation area is located in an enterprise zone
created under IC 5-28-15, the unit that designated the allocation area
shall create funds as specified in this subsection. A unit that has
obligations, bonds, or leases payable from allocated tax proceeds under
subsection (b)(4) shall establish an allocation fund for the purposes
specified in subsection (b)(4) and a special zone fund. Such a unit
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


shall, until the end of the enterprise zone phase out period, deposit each
year in the special zone fund any amount in the allocation fund derived
from property tax proceeds in excess of those described in subsection
(b)(1), (b)(2), and (b)(3) from property located in the enterprise zone
that exceeds the amount sufficient for the purposes specified in
subsection (b)(4) for the year. The amount sufficient for purposes
specified in subsection (b)(4) for the year shall be determined based on
the pro rata portion of such current property tax proceeds from the part
of the enterprise zone that is within the allocation area as compared to
all such current property tax proceeds derived from the allocation area.
A unit that has no obligations, bonds, or leases payable from allocated
tax proceeds under subsection (b)(4) shall establish a special zone fund
and deposit all the property tax proceeds in excess of those described
in subsection (b)(1), (b)(2), and (b)(3) in the fund derived from
property tax proceeds in excess of those described in subsection (b)(1),
(b)(2), and (b)(3) from property located in the enterprise zone. The unit
that creates the special zone fund shall use the fund (based on the
recommendations of the urban enterprise association) for programs in
job training, job enrichment, and basic skill development that are
designed to benefit residents and employers in the enterprise zone or
other purposes specified in subsection (b)(4), except that where
reference is made in subsection (b)(4) to allocation area it shall refer
for purposes of payments from the special zone fund only to that part
of the allocation area that is also located in the enterprise zone. Those
programs shall reserve at least one-half (1/2) of their enrollment in any
session for residents of the enterprise zone.
(h) The state board of accounts and department of local government
finance shall make the rules and prescribe the forms and procedures
that they consider expedient for the implementation of this chapter.
After each reassessment in an area under a reassessment plan prepared
under IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, the department of local government finance shall
adjust the base assessed value one (1) time to neutralize any effect of
the reassessment of the real property in the area on the property tax
proceeds allocated to the redevelopment district under this section.
After each annual adjustment under IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, the department of
local government finance shall adjust the base assessed value one (1)
time to neutralize any effect of the annual adjustment on the property
tax proceeds allocated to the redevelopment district under this section.
However, the adjustments under this subsection:
(1) may not include the effect of phasing in assessed value due to
property tax abatements under IC 6-1.1-12.1;
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(2) may not produce less property tax proceeds allocable to the
redevelopment district under subsection (b)(4) than would
otherwise have been received if the reassessment under the
reassessment plan or the annual adjustment had not occurred; and
(3) may decrease base assessed value only to the extent that
assessed values in the allocation area have been decreased due to
annual adjustments or the reassessment under the reassessment
plan.
Assessed value increases attributable to the application of an abatement
schedule under IC 6-1.1-12.1 may not be included in the base assessed
value of an allocation area. The department of local government
finance may prescribe procedures for county and township officials to
follow to assist the department in making the adjustments. The
department of local government finance may require the
redevelopment commission to submit required documentation to
neutralize the base assessed value. Any supporting documentation
the redevelopment commission is required to submit to support the
base assessed value neutralization calculation must be completed
and submitted to the department of local government finance by
July 15 of each year. If the redevelopment commission does not
submit the required documentation under this subsection by the
deadline described in this subsection in a given year, then five
percent (5%) of the excess assessed value shall be allocated to the
respective taxing units in the year the deadline described in this
subsection is missed.
(i) The allocation deadline referred to in subsection (b) is
determined in the following manner:
(1) The initial allocation deadline is December 31, 2011.
(2) Subject to subdivision (3), the initial allocation deadline and
subsequent allocation deadlines are automatically extended in
increments of five (5) years, so that allocation deadlines
subsequent to the initial allocation deadline fall on December 31,
2016, and December 31 of each fifth year thereafter.
(3) At least one (1) year before the date of an allocation deadline
determined under subdivision (2), the general assembly may enact
a law that:
(A) terminates the automatic extension of allocation deadlines
under subdivision (2); and
(B) specifically designates a particular date as the final
allocation deadline.
(j) If a redevelopment commission adopts a declaratory resolution
or an amendment to a declaratory resolution that contains an allocation
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


provision and the redevelopment commission makes either of the
filings required under section 17(e) of this chapter after the first
anniversary of the effective date of the allocation provision, the auditor
of the county in which the unit is located shall compute the base
assessed value for the allocation area using the assessment date
immediately preceding the later of:
(1) the date on which the documents are filed with the county
auditor; or
(2) the date on which the documents are filed with the department
of local government finance.
(k) For an allocation area established after June 30, 2025,
"residential property" refers to the assessed value of property that is
allocated to the one percent (1%) homestead land and improvement
categories in the county tax and billing software system.
SECTION 11. IC 36-7-14-39.6, AS ADDED BY P.L.249-2015,
SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 39.6. (a) A redevelopment commission may enter
into a written agreement with a taxpayer who owns, or is otherwise
obligated to pay property taxes on, tangible property that is or will be
located in an allocation area established under this chapter in which the
taxpayer waives review of any assessment of the taxpayer's tangible
property that is located in the allocation area for an assessment date
that occurs during the term of any specified bond or lease obligations
that are payable from property taxes in accordance with an allocation
provision for the allocation area and any applicable statute, ordinance,
or resolution. An agreement described in this section may precede the
establishment of the allocation area or the determination to issue bonds
or enter into leases payable from the allocated property taxes.
(b) The original owner of each nonowner-occupied residential
property subject to the two percent (2%) tax cap, that is located in
the tax increment financing area and is excluded from the base
assessed value, shall upon completion of construction enter into a
written agreement with the redevelopment commission indicating
the owner shall be obligated to pay the property tax for the portion
of outstanding bonds in the tax increment financing district
attributable to the property until the term length of the original
outstanding bond is retired. The written agreement with the
redevelopment commission shall be considered a lien on the
property and shall be included as part of the residential real estate
sales disclosure under IC 32-21-5. If the property is subsequently
sold as a homestead property and becomes subject to the one
percent (1%) tax cap, the new owner shall be responsible for the
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


lien on the property attributable to the written agreement with the
redevelopment commission, and the new homestead property
owner shall be obligated to fulfill the terms of the written
agreement including the payment of the property tax liability
included in the agreement.
SECTION 12. IC 36-7-14-39.8, AS ADDED BY P.L.123-2024,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 39.8. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if the
Indiana economic development corporation subsequently designates
territory that is located in an existing allocation area under this chapter
as an innovation development district under IC 36-7-32.5, the
allocation area may not be renewed or extended under this chapter until
the term of the innovation development district expires.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, for taxing districts that
include multiple tax increment financing districts under this
chapter, the original tax increment financing district does not
expire and stays active only for the purpose of satisfying
outstanding bonds issued by the subsequent tax increment
financing district, only if the redevelopment commission completes
the following requirements:
(1) Provides a written appeal to and receives the approval of
the department of local government finance.
(2) Provides written notice to the state board of accounts of
the appeal.
SECTION 13. IC 36-7-15.1-26, AS AMENDED BY .L.174-2022,
SECTION 72, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26. (a) As used in this section:
"Allocation area" means that part of a redevelopment project area
to which an allocation provision of a resolution adopted under section
8 of this chapter refers for purposes of distribution and allocation of
property taxes.
"Base assessed value" means, subject to subsection (j), the
following:
(1) If an allocation provision is adopted after June 30, 1995, in a
declaratory resolution or an amendment to a declaratory
resolution establishing an economic development area:
(A) the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(B) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A), the net
assessed value of property that is assessed as residential
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


property under the rules of the department of local government
finance, within the allocation area, as finally determined for
the current assessment date.
(2) If an allocation provision is adopted after June 30, 1997, in a
declaratory resolution or an amendment to a declaratory
resolution establishing a redevelopment project area:
(A) the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(B) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A), the net
assessed value of property that is assessed as residential
property under the rules of the department of local government
finance, within the allocation area, as finally determined for
the current assessment date.
(3) If:
(A) an allocation provision adopted before June 30, 1995, in
a declaratory resolution or an amendment to a declaratory
resolution establishing a redevelopment project area expires
after June 30, 1997; and
(B) after June 30, 1997, a new allocation provision is included
in an amendment to the declaratory resolution;
the net assessed value of all the property as finally determined for
the assessment date immediately preceding the effective date of
the allocation provision adopted after June 30, 1997, as adjusted
under subsection (h).
(4) Except as provided in subdivision (5), for all other allocation
areas, the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h).
(5) If an allocation area established in an economic development
area before July 1, 1995, is expanded after June 30, 1995, the
definition in subdivision (1) applies to the expanded part of the
area added after June 30, 1995.
(6) If an allocation area established in a redevelopment project
area before July 1, 1997, is expanded after June 30, 1997, the
definition in subdivision (2) applies to the expanded part of the
area added after June 30, 1997.
Except as provided in section 26.2 of this chapter, "property taxes"
means taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on real property. However, upon
approval by a resolution of the redevelopment commission adopted
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


before June 1, 1987, "property taxes" also includes taxes imposed
under IC 6-1.1 on depreciable personal property. If a redevelopment
commission adopted before June 1, 1987, a resolution to include within
the definition of property taxes, taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on
depreciable personal property that has a useful life in excess of eight
(8) years, the commission may by resolution determine the percentage
of taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on all depreciable personal property
that will be included within the definition of property taxes. However,
the percentage included must not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of
the taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on all depreciable personal property.
(b) A resolution adopted under section 8 of this chapter on or before
the allocation deadline determined under subsection (i) may include a
provision with respect to the allocation and distribution of property
taxes for the purposes and in the manner provided in this section. A
resolution previously adopted may include an allocation provision by
the amendment of that resolution on or before the allocation deadline
determined under subsection (i) in accordance with the procedures
required for its original adoption. A declaratory resolution or
amendment that establishes an allocation provision must include a
specific finding of fact, supported by evidence, that the adoption of the
allocation provision will result in new property taxes in the area that
would not have been generated but for the adoption of the allocation
provision. For an allocation area established before July 1, 1995, the
expiration date of any allocation provisions for the allocation area is
June 30, 2025, or the last date of any obligations that are outstanding
on July 1, 2015, whichever is later. However, for an allocation area
identified as the Consolidated Allocation Area in the report submitted
in 2013 to the fiscal body under section 36.3 of this chapter, the
expiration date of any allocation provisions for the allocation area is
January 1, 2051. A declaratory resolution or an amendment that
establishes an allocation provision after June 30, 1995, must specify an
expiration date for the allocation provision. For an allocation area
established before July 1, 2008, the expiration date may not be more
than thirty (30) years after the date on which the allocation provision
is established. For an allocation area established after June 30, 2008,
the expiration date may not be more than twenty-five (25) years after
the date on which the first obligation was incurred to pay principal and
interest on bonds or lease rentals on leases payable from tax increment
revenues. However, with respect to bonds or other obligations that were
issued before July 1, 2008, if any of the bonds or other obligations that
were scheduled when issued to mature before the specified expiration
date and that are payable only from allocated tax proceeds with respect
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


to the allocation area remain outstanding as of the expiration date, the
allocation provision does not expire until all of the bonds or other
obligations are no longer outstanding. The allocation provision may
apply to all or part of the redevelopment project area. The allocation
provision must require that any property taxes subsequently levied by
or for the benefit of any public body entitled to a distribution of
property taxes on taxable property in the allocation area be allocated
and distributed as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the proceeds of
the taxes attributable to the lesser of:
(A) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date
with respect to which the allocation and distribution is made;
or
(B) the base assessed value;
shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into the funds of
the respective taxing units.
(2) The excess of the proceeds of the property taxes imposed for
the assessment date with respect to which the allocation and
distribution is made that are attributable to taxes imposed after
being approved by the voters in a referendum or local public
question conducted after April 30, 2010, not otherwise included
in subdivision (1) shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid
into the funds of the taxing unit for which the referendum or local
public question was conducted.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, property tax
proceeds in excess of those described in subdivisions (1) and (2)
shall be allocated to the redevelopment district and, when
collected, paid into a special fund for that allocation area that may
be used by the redevelopment district only to do one (1) or more
of the following:
(A) Pay the principal of and interest on any obligations
payable solely from allocated tax proceeds that are incurred by
the redevelopment district for the purpose of financing or
refinancing the redevelopment of that allocation area.
(B) Establish, augment, or restore the debt service reserve for
bonds payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in
that allocation area.
(C) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds payable from
allocated tax proceeds in that allocation area and from the
special tax levied under section 19 of this chapter.
(D) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued by the
consolidated city to pay for local public improvements that are
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


physically located in or physically connected to that allocation
area.
(E) Pay premiums on the redemption before maturity of bonds
payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in that
allocation area.
(F) Make payments on leases payable from allocated tax
proceeds in that allocation area under section 17.1 of this
chapter.
(G) Reimburse the consolidated city for expenditures for local
public improvements (which include buildings, parking
facilities, and other items set forth in section 17 of this
chapter) that are physically located in or physically connected
to that allocation area.
(H) Reimburse the unit for rentals paid by it for a building or
parking facility that is physically located in or physically
connected to that allocation area under any lease entered into
under IC 36-1-10.
(I) Reimburse public and private entities for expenses incurred
in training employees of industrial facilities that are located:
(i) in the allocation area; and
(ii) on a parcel of real property that has been classified as
industrial property under the rules of the department of local
government finance.
However, the total amount of money spent for this purpose in
any year may not exceed the total amount of money in the
allocation fund that is attributable to property taxes paid by the
industrial facilities described in this clause. The
reimbursements under this clause must be made within three
(3) years after the date on which the investments that are the
basis for the increment financing are made.
(J) Pay the costs of carrying out an eligible efficiency project
(as defined in IC 36-9-41-1.5) within the unit that established
the redevelopment commission. However, property tax
proceeds may be used under this clause to pay the costs of
carrying out an eligible efficiency project only if those
property tax proceeds exceed the amount necessary to do the
following:
(i) Make, when due, any payments required under clauses
(A) through (I), including any payments of principal and
interest on bonds and other obligations payable under this
subdivision, any payments of premiums under this
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


subdivision on the redemption before maturity of bonds, and
any payments on leases payable under this subdivision.
(ii) Make any reimbursements required under this
subdivision.
(iii) Pay any expenses required under this subdivision.
(iv) Establish, augment, or restore any debt service reserve
under this subdivision.
(K) Expend money and provide financial assistance as
authorized in section 7(a)(21) of this chapter.
The special fund may not be used for operating expenses of the
commission.
(4) Before June 15 of each year, the commission shall do the
following:
(A) Determine the amount, if any, by which the assessed value
of the taxable property in the allocation area for the most
recent assessment date minus the base assessed value, when
multiplied by the estimated tax rate of the allocation area will
exceed the amount of assessed value needed to provide the
property taxes necessary to make, when due, principal and
interest payments on bonds described in subdivision (3) plus
the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (3) and subsection (g).
(B) Provide a written notice to the county auditor, the
legislative body of the consolidated city, the officers who are
authorized to fix budgets, tax rates, and tax levies under
IC 6-1.1-17-5 for each of the other taxing units that is wholly
or partly located within the allocation area, and (in an
electronic format) the department of local government finance.
The notice must:
(i) state the amount, if any, of excess assessed value that the
commission has determined may be allocated to the
respective taxing units in the manner prescribed in
subdivision (1); or
(ii) state that the commission has determined that there is no
excess assessed value that may be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1).
The county auditor shall allocate to the respective taxing units
the amount, if any, of excess assessed value determined by the
commission. The commission may not authorize an allocation
to the respective taxing units under this subdivision if to do so
would endanger the interests of the holders of bonds described
in subdivision (3).
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(C) If:
(i) the amount of excess assessed value determined by the
commission is expected to generate more than two hundred
percent (200%) of the amount of allocated tax proceeds
necessary to make, when due, principal and interest
payments on bonds described in subdivision (3); plus
(ii) the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (3) and subsection (g);
the commission shall submit to the legislative body of the unit
the commission's determination of the excess assessed value
that the commission proposes to allocate to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1). The
legislative body of the unit may approve the commission's
determination or modify the amount of the excess assessed
value that will be allocated to the respective taxing units in the
manner prescribed in subdivision (1).
(c) For the purpose of allocating taxes levied by or for any taxing
unit or units, the assessed value of taxable property in a territory in the
allocation area that is annexed by any taxing unit after the effective
date of the allocation provision of the resolution is the lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date with
respect to which the allocation and distribution is made; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(d) Property tax proceeds allocable to the redevelopment district
under subsection (b)(3) may, subject to subsection (b)(4), be
irrevocably pledged by the redevelopment district for payment as set
forth in subsection (b)(3).
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, each assessor shall, upon
petition of the commission, reassess the taxable property situated upon
or in, or added to, the allocation area, effective on the next assessment
date after the petition.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the assessed value of all taxable
property in the allocation area, for purposes of tax limitation, property
tax replacement, and formulation of the budget, tax rate, and tax levy
for each political subdivision in which the property is located is the
lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property as valued without regard to
this section; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(g) If any part of the allocation area is located in an enterprise zone
created under IC 5-28-15, the unit that designated the allocation area
shall create funds as specified in this subsection. A unit that has
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


obligations, bonds, or leases payable from allocated tax proceeds under
subsection (b)(3) shall establish an allocation fund for the purposes
specified in subsection (b)(3) and a special zone fund. Such a unit
shall, until the end of the enterprise zone phase out period, deposit each
year in the special zone fund the amount in the allocation fund derived
from property tax proceeds in excess of those described in subsection
(b)(1) and (b)(2) from property located in the enterprise zone that
exceeds the amount sufficient for the purposes specified in subsection
(b)(3) for the year. A unit that has no obligations, bonds, or leases
payable from allocated tax proceeds under subsection (b)(3) shall
establish a special zone fund and deposit all the property tax proceeds
in excess of those described in subsection (b)(1) and (b)(2) in the fund
derived from property tax proceeds in excess of those described in
subsection (b)(1) and (b)(2) from property located in the enterprise
zone. The unit that creates the special zone fund shall use the fund,
based on the recommendations of the urban enterprise association, for
one (1) or more of the following purposes:
(1) To pay for programs in job training, job enrichment, and basic
skill development designed to benefit residents and employers in
the enterprise zone. The programs must reserve at least one-half
(1/2) of the enrollment in any session for residents of the
enterprise zone.
(2) To make loans and grants for the purpose of stimulating
business activity in the enterprise zone or providing employment
for enterprise zone residents in the enterprise zone. These loans
and grants may be made to the following:
(A) Businesses operating in the enterprise zone.
(B) Businesses that will move their operations to the enterprise
zone if such a loan or grant is made.
(3) To provide funds to carry out other purposes specified in
subsection (b)(3). However, where reference is made in
subsection (b)(3) to the allocation area, the reference refers for
purposes of payments from the special zone fund only to that part
of the allocation area that is also located in the enterprise zone.
(h) The state board of accounts and department of local government
finance shall make the rules and prescribe the forms and procedures
that they consider expedient for the implementation of this chapter.
After each reassessment under a reassessment plan prepared under
IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, the department of local government finance shall adjust
the base assessed value one (1) time to neutralize any effect of the
reassessment of the real property in the area on the property tax
proceeds allocated to the redevelopment district under this section.
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


After each annual adjustment under IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, the department of
local government finance shall adjust the base assessed value to
neutralize any effect of the annual adjustment on the property tax
proceeds allocated to the redevelopment district under this section.
However, the adjustments under this subsection may not include the
effect of property tax abatements under IC 6-1.1-12.1, and these
adjustments may not produce less property tax proceeds allocable to
the redevelopment district under subsection (b)(3) than would
otherwise have been received if the reassessment under the
reassessment plan or annual adjustment had not occurred. The
department of local government finance may prescribe procedures for
county and township officials to follow to assist the department in
making the adjustments. The department of local government
finance may require the redevelopment commission to submit
required documentation to neutralize the base assessed value. Any
supporting documentation the redevelopment commission is
required to submit to support the base assessed value
neutralization calculation must be completed and submitted to the
department of local government finance by July 15 of each year. If
the redevelopment commission does not submit the required
documentation under this subsection by the deadline described in
this subsection in a given year, then five percent (5%) of the excess
assessed value shall be allocated to the respective taxing units in
the year the deadline described in this subsection is missed.
(i) The allocation deadline referred to in subsection (b) is
determined in the following manner:
(1) The initial allocation deadline is December 31, 2011.
(2) Subject to subdivision (3), the initial allocation deadline and
subsequent allocation deadlines are automatically extended in
increments of five (5) years, so that allocation deadlines
subsequent to the initial allocation deadline fall on December 31,
2016, and December 31 of each fifth year thereafter.
(3) At least one (1) year before the date of an allocation deadline
determined under subdivision (2), the general assembly may enact
a law that:
(A) terminates the automatic extension of allocation deadlines
under subdivision (2); and
(B) specifically designates a particular date as the final
allocation deadline.
(j) If the commission adopts a declaratory resolution or an
amendment to a declaratory resolution that contains an allocation
provision and the commission makes either of the filings required
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


under section 10(e) of this chapter after the first anniversary of the
effective date of the allocation provision, the auditor of the county in
which the unit is located shall compute the base assessed value for the
allocation area using the assessment date immediately preceding the
later of:
(1) the date on which the documents are filed with the county
auditor; or
(2) the date on which the documents are filed with the department
of local government finance.
(k) For an allocation area established after June 30, 2024,
"residential property" refers to the assessed value of property that is
allocated to the one percent (1%) homestead land and improvement
categories in the county tax and billing software system. along with the
residential assessed value as defined for purposes of calculating the
rate for the local income tax property tax relief credit designated for
residential property under IC 6-3.6-5-6(d)(3).
SECTION 14. IC 36-7-15.1-26, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 235, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 26.(a) As used in this section:
"Allocation area" means that part of a redevelopment project area
to which an allocation provision of a resolution adopted under section
8 of this chapter refers for purposes of distribution and allocation of
property taxes.
"Base assessed value" means, subject to subsection (j), the
following:
(1) If an allocation provision is adopted after June 30, 1995, in a
declaratory resolution or an amendment to a declaratory
resolution establishing an economic development area:
(A) the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(B) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A), the net
assessed value of property that is assessed as residential
property under the rules of the department of local government
finance, within the allocation area, as finally determined for
the current assessment date.
(2) If an allocation provision is adopted after June 30, 1997, in a
declaratory resolution or an amendment to a declaratory
resolution establishing a redevelopment project area:
(A) the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


effective date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(B) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A), the net
assessed value of property that is assessed as residential
property under the rules of the department of local government
finance, within the allocation area, as finally determined for
the current assessment date.
(3) If:
(A) an allocation provision adopted before June 30, 1995, in
a declaratory resolution or an amendment to a declaratory
resolution establishing a redevelopment project area expires
after June 30, 1997; and
(B) after June 30, 1997, a new allocation provision is included
in an amendment to the declaratory resolution;
the net assessed value of all the property as finally determined for
the assessment date immediately preceding the effective date of
the allocation provision adopted after June 30, 1997, as adjusted
under subsection (h).
(4) Except as provided in subdivision (5), for all other allocation
areas, the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
effective date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h).
(5) If an allocation area established in an economic development
area before July 1, 1995, is expanded after June 30, 1995, the
definition in subdivision (1) applies to the expanded part of the
area added after June 30, 1995.
(6) If an allocation area established in a redevelopment project
area before July 1, 1997, is expanded after June 30, 1997, the
definition in subdivision (2) applies to the expanded part of the
area added after June 30, 1997.
Except as provided in section 26.2 of this chapter, "property taxes"
means taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on real property. However, upon
approval by a resolution of the redevelopment commission adopted
before June 1, 1987, "property taxes" also includes taxes imposed
under IC 6-1.1 on depreciable personal property. If a redevelopment
commission adopted before June 1, 1987, a resolution to include within
the definition of property taxes, taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on
depreciable personal property that has a useful life in excess of eight
(8) years, the commission may by resolution determine the percentage
of taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on all depreciable personal property
that will be included within the definition of property taxes. However,
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


the percentage included must not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of
the taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on all depreciable personal property.
(b) A resolution adopted under section 8 of this chapter on or before
the allocation deadline determined under subsection (i) may include a
provision with respect to the allocation and distribution of property
taxes for the purposes and in the manner provided in this section. A
resolution previously adopted may include an allocation provision by
the amendment of that resolution on or before the allocation deadline
determined under subsection (i) in accordance with the procedures
required for its original adoption. A declaratory resolution or
amendment that establishes an allocation provision must include a
specific finding of fact, supported by evidence, that the adoption of the
allocation provision will result in new property taxes in the area that
would not have been generated but for the adoption of the allocation
provision. For an allocation area established before July 1, 1995, the
expiration date of any allocation provisions for the allocation area is
June 30, 2025, or the last date of any obligations that are outstanding
on July 1, 2015, whichever is later. However, for an allocation area
identified as the Consolidated Allocation Area in the report submitted
in 2013 to the fiscal body under section 36.3 of this chapter, the
expiration date of any allocation provisions for the allocation area is
January 1, 2051. A declaratory resolution or an amendment that
establishes an allocation provision after June 30, 1995, must specify an
expiration date for the allocation provision. For an allocation area
established before July 1, 2008, the expiration date may not be more
than thirty (30) years after the date on which the allocation provision
is established. For an allocation area established after June 30, 2008,
the expiration date may not be more than twenty-five (25) years after
the date on which the first obligation was incurred to pay principal and
interest on bonds or lease rentals on leases payable from tax increment
revenues. However, with respect to bonds or other obligations that were
issued before July 1, 2008, if any of the bonds or other obligations that
were scheduled when issued to mature before the specified expiration
date and that are payable only from allocated tax proceeds with respect
to the allocation area remain outstanding as of the expiration date, the
allocation provision does not expire until all of the bonds or other
obligations are no longer outstanding. The allocation provision may
apply to all or part of the redevelopment project area. The allocation
provision must require that any property taxes subsequently levied by
or for the benefit of any public body entitled to a distribution of
property taxes on taxable property in the allocation area be allocated
and distributed as follows:
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the proceeds of
the taxes attributable to the lesser of:
(A) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date
with respect to which the allocation and distribution is made;
or
(B) the base assessed value;
shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into the funds of
the respective taxing units.
(2) The excess of the proceeds of the property taxes imposed for
the assessment date with respect to which the allocation and
distribution is made that are attributable to taxes imposed after
being approved by the voters in a referendum or local public
question conducted after April 30, 2010, not otherwise included
in subdivision (1) shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid
into the funds of the taxing unit for which the referendum or local
public question was conducted.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, property tax
proceeds in excess of those described in subdivisions (1) and (2)
shall be allocated to the redevelopment district and, when
collected, paid into a special fund for that allocation area that may
be used by the redevelopment district only to do one (1) or more
of the following:
(A) Pay the principal of and interest on any obligations
payable solely from allocated tax proceeds that are incurred by
the redevelopment district for the purpose of financing or
refinancing the redevelopment of that allocation area.
(B) Establish, augment, or restore the debt service reserve for
bonds payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in
that allocation area.
(C) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds payable from
allocated tax proceeds in that allocation area and from the
special tax levied under section 19 of this chapter.
(D) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued by the
consolidated city to pay for local public improvements that are
physically located in or physically connected to that allocation
area.
(E) Pay premiums on the redemption before maturity of bonds
payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in that
allocation area.
(F) Make payments on leases payable from allocated tax
proceeds in that allocation area under section 17.1 of this
chapter.
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(G) Reimburse the consolidated city for expenditures for local
public improvements (which include buildings, parking
facilities, and other items set forth in section 17 of this
chapter) that are physically located in or physically connected
to that allocation area.
(H) Reimburse the unit for rentals paid by it for a building or
parking facility that is physically located in or physically
connected to that allocation area under any lease entered into
under IC 36-1-10.
(I) Reimburse public and private entities for expenses incurred
in training employees of industrial facilities that are located:
(i) in the allocation area; and
(ii) on a parcel of real property that has been classified as
industrial property under the rules of the department of local
government finance.
However, the total amount of money spent for this purpose in
any year may not exceed the total amount of money in the
allocation fund that is attributable to property taxes paid by the
industrial facilities described in this clause. The
reimbursements under this clause must be made within three
(3) years after the date on which the investments that are the
basis for the increment financing are made.
(J) Pay the costs of carrying out an eligible efficiency project
(as defined in IC 36-9-41-1.5) within the unit that established
the redevelopment commission. However, property tax
proceeds may be used under this clause to pay the costs of
carrying out an eligible efficiency project only if those
property tax proceeds exceed the amount necessary to do the
following:
(i) Make, when due, any payments required under clauses
(A) through (I), including any payments of principal and
interest on bonds and other obligations payable under this
subdivision, any payments of premiums under this
subdivision on the redemption before maturity of bonds, and
any payments on leases payable under this subdivision.
(ii) Make any reimbursements required under this
subdivision.
(iii) Pay any expenses required under this subdivision.
(iv) Establish, augment, or restore any debt service reserve
under this subdivision.
(K) Expend money and provide financial assistance as
authorized in section 7(a)(21) of this chapter.
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


The special fund may not be used for operating expenses of the
commission.
(4) Before June 15 of each year, the commission shall do the
following:
(A) Determine the amount, if any, by which the assessed value
of the taxable property in the allocation area for the most
recent assessment date minus the base assessed value, when
multiplied by the estimated tax rate of the allocation area will
exceed the amount of assessed value needed to provide the
property taxes necessary to make, when due, principal and
interest payments on bonds described in subdivision (3) plus
the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (3) and subsection (g).
(B) Provide a written notice to the county auditor, the
legislative body of the consolidated city, the officers who are
authorized to fix budgets, tax rates, and tax levies under
IC 6-1.1-17-5 for each of the other taxing units that is wholly
or partly located within the allocation area, and (in an
electronic format) the department of local government finance.
The notice must:
(i) state the amount, if any, of excess assessed value that the
commission has determined may be allocated to the
respective taxing units in the manner prescribed in
subdivision (1); or
(ii) state that the commission has determined that there is no
excess assessed value that may be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1).
The county auditor shall allocate to the respective taxing units
the amount, if any, of excess assessed value determined by the
commission. The commission may not authorize an allocation
to the respective taxing units under this subdivision if to do so
would endanger the interests of the holders of bonds described
in subdivision (3).
(C) If:
(i) the amount of excess assessed value determined by the
commission is expected to generate more than two hundred
percent (200%) of the amount of allocated tax proceeds
necessary to make, when due, principal and interest
payments on bonds described in subdivision (3); plus
(ii) the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (3) and subsection (g);
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


the commission shall submit to the legislative body of the unit
the commission's determination of the excess assessed value
that the commission proposes to allocate to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1). The
legislative body of the unit may approve the commission's
determination or modify the amount of the excess assessed
value that will be allocated to the respective taxing units in the
manner prescribed in subdivision (1).
(c) For the purpose of allocating taxes levied by or for any taxing
unit or units, the assessed value of taxable property in a territory in the
allocation area that is annexed by any taxing unit after the effective
date of the allocation provision of the resolution is the lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date with
respect to which the allocation and distribution is made; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(d) Property tax proceeds allocable to the redevelopment district
under subsection (b)(3) may, subject to subsection (b)(4), be
irrevocably pledged by the redevelopment district for payment as set
forth in subsection (b)(3).
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, each assessor shall, upon
petition of the commission, reassess the taxable property situated upon
or in, or added to, the allocation area, effective on the next assessment
date after the petition.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the assessed value of all taxable
property in the allocation area, for purposes of tax limitation, property
tax replacement, and formulation of the budget, tax rate, and tax levy
for each political subdivision in which the property is located is the
lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property as valued without regard to
this section; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(g) If any part of the allocation area is located in an enterprise zone
created under IC 5-28-15, the unit that designated the allocation area
shall create funds as specified in this subsection. A unit that has
obligations, bonds, or leases payable from allocated tax proceeds under
subsection (b)(3) shall establish an allocation fund for the purposes
specified in subsection (b)(3) and a special zone fund. Such a unit
shall, until the end of the enterprise zone phase out period, deposit each
year in the special zone fund the amount in the allocation fund derived
from property tax proceeds in excess of those described in subsection
(b)(1) and (b)(2) from property located in the enterprise zone that
exceeds the amount sufficient for the purposes specified in subsection
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(b)(3) for the year. A unit that has no obligations, bonds, or leases
payable from allocated tax proceeds under subsection (b)(3) shall
establish a special zone fund and deposit all the property tax proceeds
in excess of those described in subsection (b)(1) and (b)(2) in the fund
derived from property tax proceeds in excess of those described in
subsection (b)(1) and (b)(2) from property located in the enterprise
zone. The unit that creates the special zone fund shall use the fund,
based on the recommendations of the urban enterprise association, for
one (1) or more of the following purposes:
(1) To pay for programs in job training, job enrichment, and basic
skill development designed to benefit residents and employers in
the enterprise zone. The programs must reserve at least one-half
(1/2) of the enrollment in any session for residents of the
enterprise zone.
(2) To make loans and grants for the purpose of stimulating
business activity in the enterprise zone or providing employment
for enterprise zone residents in the enterprise zone. These loans
and grants may be made to the following:
(A) Businesses operating in the enterprise zone.
(B) Businesses that will move their operations to the enterprise
zone if such a loan or grant is made.
(3) To provide funds to carry out other purposes specified in
subsection (b)(3). However, where reference is made in
subsection (b)(3) to the allocation area, the reference refers for
purposes of payments from the special zone fund only to that part
of the allocation area that is also located in the enterprise zone.
(h) The state board of accounts and department of local government
finance shall make the rules and prescribe the forms and procedures
that they consider expedient for the implementation of this chapter.
After each reassessment under a reassessment plan prepared under
IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, the department of local government finance shall adjust
the base assessed value one (1) time to neutralize any effect of the
reassessment of the real property in the area on the property tax
proceeds allocated to the redevelopment district under this section.
After each annual adjustment under IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, the department of
local government finance shall adjust the base assessed value to
neutralize any effect of the annual adjustment on the property tax
proceeds allocated to the redevelopment district under this section.
However, the adjustments under this subsection may not include the
effect of property tax abatements under IC 6-1.1-12.1, and these
adjustments may not produce less property tax proceeds allocable to
the redevelopment district under subsection (b)(3) than would
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


otherwise have been received if the reassessment under the
reassessment plan or annual adjustment had not occurred. The
department of local government finance may prescribe procedures for
county and township officials to follow to assist the department in
making the adjustments. The department of local government
finance may require the redevelopment commission to submit
required documentation to neutralize the base assessed value. Any
supporting documentation the redevelopment commission is
required to submit to support the base assessed value
neutralization calculation must be completed and submitted to the
department of local government finance by July 15 of each year. If
the redevelopment commission does not submit the required
documentation under this subsection by the deadline described in
this subsection in a given year, then five percent (5%) of the excess
assessed value shall be allocated to the respective taxing units in
the year the deadline described in this subsection is missed.
(i) The allocation deadline referred to in subsection (b) is
determined in the following manner:
(1) The initial allocation deadline is December 31, 2011.
(2) Subject to subdivision (3), the initial allocation deadline and
subsequent allocation deadlines are automatically extended in
increments of five (5) years, so that allocation deadlines
subsequent to the initial allocation deadline fall on December 31,
2016, and December 31 of each fifth year thereafter.
(3) At least one (1) year before the date of an allocation deadline
determined under subdivision (2), the general assembly may enact
a law that:
(A) terminates the automatic extension of allocation deadlines
under subdivision (2); and
(B) specifically designates a particular date as the final
allocation deadline.
(j) If the commission adopts a declaratory resolution or an
amendment to a declaratory resolution that contains an allocation
provision and the commission makes either of the filings required
under section 10(e) of this chapter after the first anniversary of the
effective date of the allocation provision, the auditor of the county in
which the unit is located shall compute the base assessed value for the
allocation area using the assessment date immediately preceding the
later of:
(1) the date on which the documents are filed with the county
auditor; or
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(2) the date on which the documents are filed with the department
of local government finance.
(k) For an allocation area established after June 30, 2024,
"residential property" refers to the assessed value of property that is
allocated to the one percent (1%) homestead land and improvement
categories in the county tax and billing software system. along with the
residential assessed value as defined for purposes of calculating the
rate for the local income tax property tax relief credit designated for
residential property under IC 6-3.6-5-6(d)(3) (before its expiration).
SECTION 15. IC 36-7-15.1-26.6, AS ADDED BY P.L.249-2015,
SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26.6. (a) The commission may enter into a written
agreement with a taxpayer who owns, or is otherwise obligated to pay
property taxes on, tangible property that is or will be located in an
allocation area established under this chapter in which the taxpayer
waives review of any assessment of the taxpayer's tangible property
that is located in the allocation area for an assessment date that occurs
during the term of any specified bond or lease obligations that are
payable from property taxes in accordance with an allocation provision
for the allocation area and any applicable statute, ordinance, or
resolution. An agreement described in this section may precede the
establishment of the allocation area or the determination to issue bonds
or enter into leases payable from the allocated property taxes.
(b) The original owner of each nonowner-occupied residential
property subject to the two percent (2%) tax cap, that is located in
the tax increment financing area and is excluded from the base
assessed value, shall upon completion of construction enter into a
written agreement with the redevelopment commission indicating
the owner shall be obligated to pay the property tax for the portion
of outstanding bonds in the tax increment financing district
attributable to the property until the term length of the original
outstanding bond is retired. The written agreement with the
redevelopment commission shall be considered a lien on the
property and shall be included as part of the residential real estate
sales disclosure under IC 32-21-5. If the property is subsequently
sold as a homestead property and becomes subject to the one
percent (1%) tax cap, the new owner shall be responsible for the
lien on the property attributable to the written agreement with the
redevelopment commission, and the new homestead property
owner shall be obligated to fulfill the terms of the written
agreement including the payment of the property tax liability
included in the agreement.
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


SECTION 16. IC 36-7-15.1-26.8, AS ADDED BY P.L.123-2024,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26.8. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if the
Indiana economic development corporation subsequently designates
territory that is located in an existing allocation area under this chapter
as an innovation development district under IC 36-7-32.5, the
allocation area may not be renewed or extended under this chapter until
the term of the innovation development district expires.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, for taxing districts that
include multiple tax increment financing districts under this
chapter, the original tax increment financing district does not
expire and stays active only for the purpose of satisfying
outstanding bonds issued by the subsequent tax increment
financing district, only if the redevelopment commission completes
the following requirements:
(1) Provides a written appeal to and receives the approval of
the department of local government finance.
(2) Provides written notice to the state board of accounts of
the appeal.
SECTION 17. IC 36-7-15.1-53, AS AMENDED BY P.L.174-2022,
SECTION 73, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 53. (a) As used in this section:
"Allocation area" means that part of a redevelopment project area
to which an allocation provision of a resolution adopted under section
40 of this chapter refers for purposes of distribution and allocation of
property taxes.
"Base assessed value" means, subject to subsection (j):
(1) the net assessed value of all the property as finally determined
for the assessment date immediately preceding the effective date
of the allocation provision of the declaratory resolution, as
adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(2) to the extent that it is not included in subdivision (1), the net
assessed value of property that is assessed as residential property
under the rules of the department of local government finance, as
finally determined for the current assessment date.
Except as provided in section 55 of this chapter, "property taxes"
means taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on real property.
(b) A resolution adopted under section 40 of this chapter on or
before the allocation deadline determined under subsection (i) may
include a provision with respect to the allocation and distribution of
property taxes for the purposes and in the manner provided in this
section. A resolution previously adopted may include an allocation
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


provision by the amendment of that resolution on or before the
allocation deadline determined under subsection (i) in accordance with
the procedures required for its original adoption. A declaratory
resolution or an amendment that establishes an allocation provision
must be approved by resolution of the legislative body of the excluded
city and must specify an expiration date for the allocation provision.
For an allocation area established before July 1, 2008, the expiration
date may not be more than thirty (30) years after the date on which the
allocation provision is established. For an allocation area established
after June 30, 2008, the expiration date may not be more than
twenty-five (25) years after the date on which the first obligation was
incurred to pay principal and interest on bonds or lease rentals on
leases payable from tax increment revenues. However, with respect to
bonds or other obligations that were issued before July 1, 2008, if any
of the bonds or other obligations that were scheduled when issued to
mature before the specified expiration date and that are payable only
from allocated tax proceeds with respect to the allocation area remain
outstanding as of the expiration date, the allocation provision does not
expire until all of the bonds or other obligations are no longer
outstanding. The allocation provision may apply to all or part of the
redevelopment project area. The allocation provision must require that
any property taxes subsequently levied by or for the benefit of any
public body entitled to a distribution of property taxes on taxable
property in the allocation area be allocated and distributed as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the proceeds of
the taxes attributable to the lesser of:
(A) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date
with respect to which the allocation and distribution is made;
or
(B) the base assessed value;
shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into the funds of
the respective taxing units.
(2) The excess of the proceeds of the property taxes imposed for
the assessment date with respect to which the allocation and
distribution is made that are attributable to taxes imposed after
being approved by the voters in a referendum or local public
question conducted after April 30, 2010, not otherwise included
in subdivision (1) shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid
into the funds of the taxing unit for which the referendum or local
public question was conducted.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, property tax
proceeds in excess of those described in subdivisions (1) and (2)
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


shall be allocated to the redevelopment district and, when
collected, paid into a special fund for that allocation area that may
be used by the redevelopment district only to do one (1) or more
of the following:
(A) Pay the principal of and interest on any obligations
payable solely from allocated tax proceeds that are incurred by
the redevelopment district for the purpose of financing or
refinancing the redevelopment of that allocation area.
(B) Establish, augment, or restore the debt service reserve for
bonds payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in
that allocation area.
(C) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds payable from
allocated tax proceeds in that allocation area and from the
special tax levied under section 50 of this chapter.
(D) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued by the
excluded city to pay for local public improvements that are
physically located in or physically connected to that allocation
area.
(E) Pay premiums on the redemption before maturity of bonds
payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in that
allocation area.
(F) Make payments on leases payable from allocated tax
proceeds in that allocation area under section 46 of this
chapter.
(G) Reimburse the excluded city for expenditures for local
public improvements (which include buildings, park facilities,
and other items set forth in section 45 of this chapter) that are
physically located in or physically connected to that allocation
area.
(H) Reimburse the unit for rentals paid by it for a building or
parking facility that is physically located in or physically
connected to that allocation area under any lease entered into
under IC 36-1-10.
(I) Reimburse public and private entities for expenses incurred
in training employees of industrial facilities that are located:
(i) in the allocation area; and
(ii) on a parcel of real property that has been classified as
industrial property under the rules of the department of local
government finance.
However, the total amount of money spent for this purpose in
any year may not exceed the total amount of money in the
allocation fund that is attributable to property taxes paid by the
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


industrial facilities described in this clause. The
reimbursements under this clause must be made within three
(3) years after the date on which the investments that are the
basis for the increment financing are made.
The special fund may not be used for operating expenses of the
commission.
(4) Before June 15 of each year, the commission shall do the
following:
(A) Determine the amount, if any, by which the assessed value
of the taxable property in the allocation area for the most
recent assessment date minus the base assessed value, when
multiplied by the estimated tax rate of the allocation area, will
exceed the amount of assessed value needed to provide the
property taxes necessary to make, when due, principal and
interest payments on bonds described in subdivision (3) plus
the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (3) and subsection (g).
(B) Provide a written notice to the county auditor, the fiscal
body of the county or municipality that established the
department of redevelopment, the officers who are authorized
to fix budgets, tax rates, and tax levies under IC 6-1.1-17-5 for
each of the other taxing units that is wholly or partly located
within the allocation area, and (in an electronic format) the
department of local government finance. The notice must:
(i) state the amount, if any, of excess assessed value that the
commission has determined may be allocated to the
respective taxing units in the manner prescribed in
subdivision (1); or
(ii) state that the commission has determined that there is no
excess assessed value that may be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1).
The county auditor shall allocate to the respective taxing units
the amount, if any, of excess assessed value determined by the
commission. The commission may not authorize an allocation
to the respective taxing units under this subdivision if to do so
would endanger the interests of the holders of bonds described
in subdivision (3).
(c) For the purpose of allocating taxes levied by or for any taxing
unit or units, the assessed value of taxable property in a territory in the
allocation area that is annexed by any taxing unit after the effective
date of the allocation provision of the resolution is the lesser of:
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(1) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date with
respect to which the allocation and distribution is made; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(d) Property tax proceeds allocable to the redevelopment district
under subsection (b)(3) may, subject to subsection (b)(4), be
irrevocably pledged by the redevelopment district for payment as set
forth in subsection (b)(3).
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, each assessor shall, upon
petition of the commission, reassess the taxable property situated upon
or in, or added to, the allocation area, effective on the next assessment
date after the petition.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the assessed value of all taxable
property in the allocation area, for purposes of tax limitation, property
tax replacement, and formulation of the budget, tax rate, and tax levy
for each political subdivision in which the property is located, is the
lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property as valued without regard to
this section; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(g) If any part of the allocation area is located in an enterprise zone
created under IC 5-28-15, the unit that designated the allocation area
shall create funds as specified in this subsection. A unit that has
obligations, bonds, or leases payable from allocated tax proceeds under
subsection (b)(3) shall establish an allocation fund for the purposes
specified in subsection (b)(3) and a special zone fund. Such a unit
shall, until the end of the enterprise zone phase out period, deposit each
year in the special zone fund the amount in the allocation fund derived
from property tax proceeds in excess of those described in subsection
(b)(1) and (b)(2) from property located in the enterprise zone that
exceeds the amount sufficient for the purposes specified in subsection
(b)(3) for the year. A unit that has no obligations, bonds, or leases
payable from allocated tax proceeds under subsection (b)(3) shall
establish a special zone fund and deposit all the property tax proceeds
in excess of those described in subsection (b)(1) and (b)(2) in the fund
derived from property tax proceeds in excess of those described in
subsection (b)(1) and (b)(2) from property located in the enterprise
zone. The unit that creates the special zone fund shall use the fund,
based on the recommendations of the urban enterprise association, for
one (1) or more of the following purposes:
(1) To pay for programs in job training, job enrichment, and basic
skill development designed to benefit residents and employers in
the enterprise zone. The programs must reserve at least one-half
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(1/2) of the enrollment in any session for residents of the
enterprise zone.
(2) To make loans and grants for the purpose of stimulating
business activity in the enterprise zone or providing employment
for enterprise zone residents in an enterprise zone. These loans
and grants may be made to the following:
(A) Businesses operating in the enterprise zone.
(B) Businesses that will move their operations to the enterprise
zone if such a loan or grant is made.
(3) To provide funds to carry out other purposes specified in
subsection (b)(3). However, where reference is made in
subsection (b)(3) to the allocation area, the reference refers, for
purposes of payments from the special zone fund, only to that part
of the allocation area that is also located in the enterprise zone.
(h) The state board of accounts and department of local government
finance shall make the rules and prescribe the forms and procedures
that they consider expedient for the implementation of this chapter.
After each reassessment of real property in an area under a county's
reassessment plan prepared under IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, the department of
local government finance shall adjust the base assessed value one (1)
time to neutralize any effect of the reassessment of the real property in
the area on the property tax proceeds allocated to the redevelopment
district under this section. After each annual adjustment under
IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, the department of local government finance shall adjust
the base assessed value to neutralize any effect of the annual
adjustment on the property tax proceeds allocated to the redevelopment
district under this section. However, the adjustments under this
subsection may not include the effect of property tax abatements under
IC 6-1.1-12.1, and these adjustments may not produce less property tax
proceeds allocable to the redevelopment district under subsection
(b)(3) than would otherwise have been received if the reassessment
under the county's reassessment plan or annual adjustment had not
occurred. The department of local government finance may prescribe
procedures for county and township officials to follow to assist the
department in making the adjustments. The department of local
government finance may require the redevelopment commission to
submit required documentation to neutralize the base assessed
value. Any supporting documentation the redevelopment
commission is required to submit to support the base assessed
value neutralization calculation must be completed and submitted
to the department of local government finance by July 15 of each
year. If the redevelopment commission does not submit the
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


required documentation under this subsection by the deadline
described in this subsection in a given year, then five percent (5%)
of the excess assessed value shall be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the year the deadline described in this subsection is
missed.
(i) The allocation deadline referred to in subsection (b) is
determined in the following manner:
(1) The initial allocation deadline is December 31, 2011.
(2) Subject to subdivision (3), the initial allocation deadline and
subsequent allocation deadlines are automatically extended in
increments of five (5) years, so that allocation deadlines
subsequent to the initial allocation deadline fall on December 31,
2016, and December 31 of each fifth year thereafter.
(3) At least one (1) year before the date of an allocation deadline
determined under subdivision (2), the general assembly may enact
a law that:
(A) terminates the automatic extension of allocation deadlines
under subdivision (2); and
(B) specifically designates a particular date as the final
allocation deadline.
(j) If the commission adopts a declaratory resolution or an
amendment to a declaratory resolution that contains an allocation
provision and the commission makes either of the filings required
under section 10(e) of this chapter after the first anniversary of the
effective date of the allocation provision, the auditor of the county in
which the unit is located shall compute the base assessed value for the
allocation area using the assessment date immediately preceding the
later of:
(1) the date on which the documents are filed with the county
auditor; or
(2) the date on which the documents are filed with the department
of local government finance.
(k) For an allocation area established after June 30, 2024,
"residential property" refers to the assessed value of property that is
allocated to the one percent (1%) homestead land and improvement
categories in the county tax and billing software system. along with the
residential assessed value as defined for purposes of calculating the
rate for the local income tax property tax relief credit designated for
residential property under IC 6-3.6-5-6(d)(3).
SECTION 18. IC 36-7-15.1-53, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 236, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 53. (a) As used in this section:
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


"Allocation area" means that part of a redevelopment project area
to which an allocation provision of a resolution adopted under section
40 of this chapter refers for purposes of distribution and allocation of
property taxes.
"Base assessed value" means, subject to subsection (j):
(1) the net assessed value of all the property as finally determined
for the assessment date immediately preceding the effective date
of the allocation provision of the declaratory resolution, as
adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(2) to the extent that it is not included in subdivision (1), the net
assessed value of property that is assessed as residential property
under the rules of the department of local government finance, as
finally determined for the current assessment date.
Except as provided in section 55 of this chapter, "property taxes"
means taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on real property.
(b) A resolution adopted under section 40 of this chapter on or
before the allocation deadline determined under subsection (i) may
include a provision with respect to the allocation and distribution of
property taxes for the purposes and in the manner provided in this
section. A resolution previously adopted may include an allocation
provision by the amendment of that resolution on or before the
allocation deadline determined under subsection (i) in accordance with
the procedures required for its original adoption. A declaratory
resolution or an amendment that establishes an allocation provision
must be approved by resolution of the legislative body of the excluded
city and must specify an expiration date for the allocation provision.
For an allocation area established before July 1, 2008, the expiration
date may not be more than thirty (30) years after the date on which the
allocation provision is established. For an allocation area established
after June 30, 2008, the expiration date may not be more than
twenty-five (25) years after the date on which the first obligation was
incurred to pay principal and interest on bonds or lease rentals on
leases payable from tax increment revenues. However, with respect to
bonds or other obligations that were issued before July 1, 2008, if any
of the bonds or other obligations that were scheduled when issued to
mature before the specified expiration date and that are payable only
from allocated tax proceeds with respect to the allocation area remain
outstanding as of the expiration date, the allocation provision does not
expire until all of the bonds or other obligations are no longer
outstanding. The allocation provision may apply to all or part of the
redevelopment project area. The allocation provision must require that
any property taxes subsequently levied by or for the benefit of any
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


public body entitled to a distribution of property taxes on taxable
property in the allocation area be allocated and distributed as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the proceeds of
the taxes attributable to the lesser of:
(A) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date
with respect to which the allocation and distribution is made;
or
(B) the base assessed value;
shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into the funds of
the respective taxing units.
(2) The excess of the proceeds of the property taxes imposed for
the assessment date with respect to which the allocation and
distribution is made that are attributable to taxes imposed after
being approved by the voters in a referendum or local public
question conducted after April 30, 2010, not otherwise included
in subdivision (1) shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid
into the funds of the taxing unit for which the referendum or local
public question was conducted.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, property tax
proceeds in excess of those described in subdivisions (1) and (2)
shall be allocated to the redevelopment district and, when
collected, paid into a special fund for that allocation area that may
be used by the redevelopment district only to do one (1) or more
of the following:
(A) Pay the principal of and interest on any obligations
payable solely from allocated tax proceeds that are incurred by
the redevelopment district for the purpose of financing or
refinancing the redevelopment of that allocation area.
(B) Establish, augment, or restore the debt service reserve for
bonds payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in
that allocation area.
(C) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds payable from
allocated tax proceeds in that allocation area and from the
special tax levied under section 50 of this chapter.
(D) Pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued by the
excluded city to pay for local public improvements that are
physically located in or physically connected to that allocation
area.
(E) Pay premiums on the redemption before maturity of bonds
payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in that
allocation area.
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(F) Make payments on leases payable from allocated tax
proceeds in that allocation area under section 46 of this
chapter.
(G) Reimburse the excluded city for expenditures for local
public improvements (which include buildings, park facilities,
and other items set forth in section 45 of this chapter) that are
physically located in or physically connected to that allocation
area.
(H) Reimburse the unit for rentals paid by it for a building or
parking facility that is physically located in or physically
connected to that allocation area under any lease entered into
under IC 36-1-10.
(I) Reimburse public and private entities for expenses incurred
in training employees of industrial facilities that are located:
(i) in the allocation area; and
(ii) on a parcel of real property that has been classified as
industrial property under the rules of the department of local
government finance.
However, the total amount of money spent for this purpose in
any year may not exceed the total amount of money in the
allocation fund that is attributable to property taxes paid by the
industrial facilities described in this clause. The
reimbursements under this clause must be made within three
(3) years after the date on which the investments that are the
basis for the increment financing are made.
The special fund may not be used for operating expenses of the
commission.
(4) Before June 15 of each year, the commission shall do the
following:
(A) Determine the amount, if any, by which the assessed value
of the taxable property in the allocation area for the most
recent assessment date minus the base assessed value, when
multiplied by the estimated tax rate of the allocation area, will
exceed the amount of assessed value needed to provide the
property taxes necessary to make, when due, principal and
interest payments on bonds described in subdivision (3) plus
the amount necessary for other purposes described in
subdivision (3) and subsection (g).
(B) Provide a written notice to the county auditor, the fiscal
body of the county or municipality that established the
department of redevelopment, the officers who are authorized
to fix budgets, tax rates, and tax levies under IC 6-1.1-17-5 for
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


each of the other taxing units that is wholly or partly located
within the allocation area, and (in an electronic format) the
department of local government finance. The notice must:
(i) state the amount, if any, of excess assessed value that the
commission has determined may be allocated to the
respective taxing units in the manner prescribed in
subdivision (1); or
(ii) state that the commission has determined that there is no
excess assessed value that may be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1).
The county auditor shall allocate to the respective taxing units
the amount, if any, of excess assessed value determined by the
commission. The commission may not authorize an allocation
to the respective taxing units under this subdivision if to do so
would endanger the interests of the holders of bonds described
in subdivision (3).
(c) For the purpose of allocating taxes levied by or for any taxing
unit or units, the assessed value of taxable property in a territory in the
allocation area that is annexed by any taxing unit after the effective
date of the allocation provision of the resolution is the lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date with
respect to which the allocation and distribution is made; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(d) Property tax proceeds allocable to the redevelopment district
under subsection (b)(3) may, subject to subsection (b)(4), be
irrevocably pledged by the redevelopment district for payment as set
forth in subsection (b)(3).
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, each assessor shall, upon
petition of the commission, reassess the taxable property situated upon
or in, or added to, the allocation area, effective on the next assessment
date after the petition.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the assessed value of all taxable
property in the allocation area, for purposes of tax limitation, property
tax replacement, and formulation of the budget, tax rate, and tax levy
for each political subdivision in which the property is located, is the
lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property as valued without regard to
this section; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(g) If any part of the allocation area is located in an enterprise zone
created under IC 5-28-15, the unit that designated the allocation area
shall create funds as specified in this subsection. A unit that has
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


obligations, bonds, or leases payable from allocated tax proceeds under
subsection (b)(3) shall establish an allocation fund for the purposes
specified in subsection (b)(3) and a special zone fund. Such a unit
shall, until the end of the enterprise zone phase out period, deposit each
year in the special zone fund the amount in the allocation fund derived
from property tax proceeds in excess of those described in subsection
(b)(1) and (b)(2) from property located in the enterprise zone that
exceeds the amount sufficient for the purposes specified in subsection
(b)(3) for the year. A unit that has no obligations, bonds, or leases
payable from allocated tax proceeds under subsection (b)(3) shall
establish a special zone fund and deposit all the property tax proceeds
in excess of those described in subsection (b)(1) and (b)(2) in the fund
derived from property tax proceeds in excess of those described in
subsection (b)(1) and (b)(2) from property located in the enterprise
zone. The unit that creates the special zone fund shall use the fund,
based on the recommendations of the urban enterprise association, for
one (1) or more of the following purposes:
(1) To pay for programs in job training, job enrichment, and basic
skill development designed to benefit residents and employers in
the enterprise zone. The programs must reserve at least one-half
(1/2) of the enrollment in any session for residents of the
enterprise zone.
(2) To make loans and grants for the purpose of stimulating
business activity in the enterprise zone or providing employment
for enterprise zone residents in an enterprise zone. These loans
and grants may be made to the following:
(A) Businesses operating in the enterprise zone.
(B) Businesses that will move their operations to the enterprise
zone if such a loan or grant is made.
(3) To provide funds to carry out other purposes specified in
subsection (b)(3). However, where reference is made in
subsection (b)(3) to the allocation area, the reference refers, for
purposes of payments from the special zone fund, only to that part
of the allocation area that is also located in the enterprise zone.
(h) The state board of accounts and department of local government
finance shall make the rules and prescribe the forms and procedures
that they consider expedient for the implementation of this chapter.
After each reassessment of real property in an area under a county's
reassessment plan prepared under IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, the department of
local government finance shall adjust the base assessed value one (1)
time to neutralize any effect of the reassessment of the real property in
the area on the property tax proceeds allocated to the redevelopment
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


district under this section. After each annual adjustment under
IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, the department of local government finance shall adjust
the base assessed value to neutralize any effect of the annual
adjustment on the property tax proceeds allocated to the redevelopment
district under this section. However, the adjustments under this
subsection may not include the effect of property tax abatements under
IC 6-1.1-12.1, and these adjustments may not produce less property tax
proceeds allocable to the redevelopment district under subsection
(b)(3) than would otherwise have been received if the reassessment
under the county's reassessment plan or annual adjustment had not
occurred. The department of local government finance may prescribe
procedures for county and township officials to follow to assist the
department in making the adjustments. The department of local
government finance may require the redevelopment commission to
submit required documentation to neutralize the base assessed
value. Any supporting documentation the redevelopment
commission is required to submit to support the base assessed
value neutralization calculation must be completed and submitted
to the department of local government finance by July 15 of each
year. If the redevelopment commission does not submit the
required documentation under this subsection by the deadline
described in this subsection in a given year, then five percent (5%)
of the excess assessed value shall be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the year the deadline described in this subsection is
missed.
(i) The allocation deadline referred to in subsection (b) is
determined in the following manner:
(1) The initial allocation deadline is December 31, 2011.
(2) Subject to subdivision (3), the initial allocation deadline and
subsequent allocation deadlines are automatically extended in
increments of five (5) years, so that allocation deadlines
subsequent to the initial allocation deadline fall on December 31,
2016, and December 31 of each fifth year thereafter.
(3) At least one (1) year before the date of an allocation deadline
determined under subdivision (2), the general assembly may enact
a law that:
(A) terminates the automatic extension of allocation deadlines
under subdivision (2); and
(B) specifically designates a particular date as the final
allocation deadline.
(j) If the commission adopts a declaratory resolution or an
amendment to a declaratory resolution that contains an allocation
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


provision and the commission makes either of the filings required
under section 10(e) of this chapter after the first anniversary of the
effective date of the allocation provision, the auditor of the county in
which the unit is located shall compute the base assessed value for the
allocation area using the assessment date immediately preceding the
later of:
(1) the date on which the documents are filed with the county
auditor; or
(2) the date on which the documents are filed with the department
of local government finance.
(k) For an allocation area established after June 30, 2024,
"residential property" refers to the assessed value of property that is
allocated to the one percent (1%) homestead land and improvement
categories in the county tax and billing software system. along with the
residential assessed value as defined for purposes of calculating the
rate for the local income tax property tax relief credit designated for
residential property under IC 6-3.6-5-6(d)(3) (before its expiration).
SECTION 19. IC 36-7-30-25, AS AMENDED BY P.L.174-2022,
SECTION 74, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 25. (a) The following definitions apply throughout
this section:
(1) "Allocation area" means that part of a military base reuse area
to which an allocation provision of a declaratory resolution
adopted under section 10 of this chapter refers for purposes of
distribution and allocation of property taxes.
(2) "Base assessed value" means, subject to subsection (i):
(A) the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
adoption date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(B) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A) or (C), the
net assessed value of any and all parcels or classes of parcels
identified as part of the base assessed value in the declaratory
resolution or an amendment thereto, as finally determined for
any subsequent assessment date; plus
(C) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A) or (B), the
net assessed value of property that is assessed as residential
property under the rules of the department of local government
finance, within the allocation area, as finally determined for
the current assessment date.
Clause (C) applies only to allocation areas established in a
military reuse area after June 30, 1997, and to the part of an
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


allocation area that was established before June 30, 1997, and that
is added to an existing allocation area after June 30, 1997.
(3) "Property taxes" means taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on real
property.
(b) A declaratory resolution adopted under section 10 of this chapter
before the date set forth in IC 36-7-14-39(b) pertaining to declaratory
resolutions adopted under IC 36-7-14-15 may include a provision with
respect to the allocation and distribution of property taxes for the
purposes and in the manner provided in this section. A declaratory
resolution previously adopted may include an allocation provision by
the amendment of that declaratory resolution in accordance with the
procedures set forth in section 13 of this chapter. The allocation
provision may apply to all or part of the military base reuse area. The
allocation provision must require that any property taxes subsequently
levied by or for the benefit of any public body entitled to a distribution
of property taxes on taxable property in the allocation area be allocated
and distributed as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the proceeds of
the taxes attributable to the lesser of:
(A) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date
with respect to which the allocation and distribution is made;
or
(B) the base assessed value;
shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into the funds of
the respective taxing units.
(2) The excess of the proceeds of the property taxes imposed for
the assessment date with respect to which the allocation and
distribution are made that are attributable to taxes imposed after
being approved by the voters in a referendum or local public
question conducted after April 30, 2010, not otherwise included
in subdivision (1) shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid
into the funds of the taxing unit for which the referendum or local
public question was conducted.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, property tax
proceeds in excess of those described in subdivisions (1) and (2)
shall be allocated to the military base reuse district and, when
collected, paid into an allocation fund for that allocation area that
may be used by the military base reuse district and only to do one
(1) or more of the following:
(A) Pay the principal of and interest and redemption premium
on any obligations incurred by the military base reuse district
or any other entity for the purpose of financing or refinancing
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


military base reuse activities in or directly serving or
benefiting that allocation area.
(B) Establish, augment, or restore the debt service reserve for
bonds payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in
that allocation area or from other revenues of the reuse
authority, including lease rental revenues.
(C) Make payments on leases payable solely or in part from
allocated tax proceeds in that allocation area.
(D) Reimburse any other governmental body for expenditures
made for local public improvements (or structures) in or
directly serving or benefiting that allocation area.
(E) Pay expenses incurred by the reuse authority, any other
department of the unit, or a department of another
governmental entity for local public improvements or
structures that are in the allocation area or directly serving or
benefiting the allocation area, including expenses for the
operation and maintenance of these local public improvements
or structures if the reuse authority determines those operation
and maintenance expenses are necessary or desirable to carry
out the purposes of this chapter.
(F) Reimburse public and private entities for expenses
incurred in training employees of industrial facilities that are
located:
(i) in the allocation area; and
(ii) on a parcel of real property that has been classified as
industrial property under the rules of the department of local
government finance.
However, the total amount of money spent for this purpose in
any year may not exceed the total amount of money in the
allocation fund that is attributable to property taxes paid by the
industrial facilities described in this clause. The
reimbursements under this clause must be made not more than
three (3) years after the date on which the investments that are
the basis for the increment financing are made.
(G) Expend money and provide financial assistance as
authorized in section 9(a)(25) of this chapter.
Except as provided in clause (E), the allocation fund may not be
used for operating expenses of the reuse authority.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (g), before July 15 of each
year the reuse authority shall do the following:
(A) Determine the amount, if any, by which property taxes
payable to the allocation fund in the following year will exceed
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


the amount of property taxes necessary to make, when due,
principal and interest payments on bonds described in
subdivision (3) plus the amount necessary for other purposes
described in subdivision (3).
(B) Provide a written notice to the county auditor, the fiscal
body of the unit that established the reuse authority, and the
officers who are authorized to fix budgets, tax rates, and tax
levies under IC 6-1.1-17-5 for each of the other taxing units
that is wholly or partly located within the allocation area. The
notice must:
(i) state the amount, if any, of excess property taxes that the
reuse authority has determined may be paid to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1); or
(ii) state that the reuse authority has determined that there
are no excess property tax proceeds that may be allocated to
the respective taxing units in the manner prescribed in
subdivision (1).
The county auditor shall allocate to the respective taxing units
the amount, if any, of excess property tax proceeds determined
by the reuse authority. The reuse authority may not authorize
a payment to the respective taxing units under this subdivision
if to do so would endanger the interest of the holders of bonds
described in subdivision (3) or lessors under section 19 of this
chapter.
(c) For the purpose of allocating taxes levied by or for any taxing
unit or units, the assessed value of taxable property in a territory in the
allocation area that is annexed by a taxing unit after the effective date
of the allocation provision of the declaratory resolution is the lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date with
respect to which the allocation and distribution is made; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(d) Property tax proceeds allocable to the military base reuse district
under subsection (b)(3) may, subject to subsection (b)(4), be
irrevocably pledged by the military base reuse district for payment as
set forth in subsection (b)(3).
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, each assessor shall, upon
petition of the reuse authority, reassess the taxable property situated
upon or in or added to the allocation area, effective on the next
assessment date after the petition.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the assessed value of all taxable
property in the allocation area, for purposes of tax limitation, property
tax replacement, and the making of the budget, tax rate, and tax levy
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


for each political subdivision in which the property is located is the
lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property as valued without regard to
this section; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(g) If any part of the allocation area is located in an enterprise zone
created under IC 5-28-15, the unit that designated the allocation area
shall create funds as specified in this subsection. A unit that has
obligations, bonds, or leases payable from allocated tax proceeds under
subsection (b)(3) shall establish an allocation fund for the purposes
specified in subsection (b)(3) and a special zone fund. Such a unit
shall, until the end of the enterprise zone phase out period, deposit each
year in the special zone fund any amount in the allocation fund derived
from property tax proceeds in excess of those described in subsection
(b)(1) and (b)(2) from property located in the enterprise zone that
exceeds the amount sufficient for the purposes specified in subsection
(b)(3) for the year. The amount sufficient for purposes specified in
subsection (b)(3) for the year shall be determined based on the pro rata
part of such current property tax proceeds from the part of the
enterprise zone that is within the allocation area as compared to all
such current property tax proceeds derived from the allocation area. A
unit that does not have obligations, bonds, or leases payable from
allocated tax proceeds under subsection (b)(3) shall establish a special
zone fund and deposit all the property tax proceeds in excess of those
described in subsection (b)(1) and (b)(2) that are derived from property
in the enterprise zone in the fund. The unit that creates the special zone
fund shall use the fund (based on the recommendations of the urban
enterprise association) for programs in job training, job enrichment,
and basic skill development that are designed to benefit residents and
employers in the enterprise zone or other purposes specified in
subsection (b)(3), except that where reference is made in subsection
(b)(3) to allocation area it shall refer for purposes of payments from the
special zone fund only to that part of the allocation area that is also
located in the enterprise zone. The programs shall reserve at least
one-half (1/2) of their enrollment in any session for residents of the
enterprise zone.
(h) After each reassessment of real property in an area under the
county's reassessment plan under IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, the department of
local government finance shall adjust the base assessed value one (1)
time to neutralize any effect of the reassessment of the real property in
the area on the property tax proceeds allocated to the military base
reuse district under this section. After each annual adjustment under
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, the department of local government finance shall adjust
the base assessed value to neutralize any effect of the annual
adjustment on the property tax proceeds allocated to the military base
reuse district under this section. However, the adjustments under this
subsection may not include the effect of property tax abatements under
IC 6-1.1-12.1, and these adjustments may not produce less property tax
proceeds allocable to the military base reuse district under subsection
(b)(3) than would otherwise have been received if the reassessment
under the county's reassessment plan or annual adjustment had not
occurred. The department of local government finance may prescribe
procedures for county and township officials to follow to assist the
department in making the adjustments. The department of local
government finance may require the reuse authority to submit
required documentation to neutralize the base assessed value. Any
supporting documentation the reuse authority is required to
submit to support the base assessed value neutralization
calculation must be completed and submitted to the department of
local government finance by July 15 of each year. If the reuse
authority does not submit the required documentation under this
subsection by the deadline described in this subsection in a given
year, then five percent (5%) of the excess assessed value shall be
allocated to the respective taxing units in the year the deadline
described in this subsection is missed.
(i) If the reuse authority adopts a declaratory resolution or an
amendment to a declaratory resolution that contains an allocation
provision and the reuse authority makes either of the filings required
under section 12(c) or 13(f) of this chapter after the first anniversary of
the effective date of the allocation provision, the auditor of the county
in which the military base reuse district is located shall compute the
base assessed value for the allocation area using the assessment date
immediately preceding the later of:
(1) the date on which the documents are filed with the county
auditor; or
(2) the date on which the documents are filed with the department
of local government finance.
(j) For an allocation area established after June 30, 2024,
"residential property" refers to the assessed value of property that is
allocated to the one percent (1%) homestead land and improvement
categories in the county tax and billing software system. along with the
residential assessed value as defined for purposes of calculating the
rate for the local income tax property tax relief credit designated for
residential property under IC 6-3.6-5-6(d)(3).
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


SECTION 20. IC 36-7-30-25, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 237, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 25. (a) The following definitions
apply throughout this section:
(1) "Allocation area" means that part of a military base reuse area
to which an allocation provision of a declaratory resolution
adopted under section 10 of this chapter refers for purposes of
distribution and allocation of property taxes.
(2) "Base assessed value" means, subject to subsection (i):
(A) the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
adoption date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(B) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A) or (C), the
net assessed value of any and all parcels or classes of parcels
identified as part of the base assessed value in the declaratory
resolution or an amendment thereto, as finally determined for
any subsequent assessment date; plus
(C) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A) or (B), the
net assessed value of property that is assessed as residential
property under the rules of the department of local government
finance, within the allocation area, as finally determined for
the current assessment date.
Clause (C) applies only to allocation areas established in a
military reuse area after June 30, 1997, and to the part of an
allocation area that was established before June 30, 1997, and that
is added to an existing allocation area after June 30, 1997.
(3) "Property taxes" means taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on real
property.
(b) A declaratory resolution adopted under section 10 of this chapter
before the date set forth in IC 36-7-14-39(b) pertaining to declaratory
resolutions adopted under IC 36-7-14-15 may include a provision with
respect to the allocation and distribution of property taxes for the
purposes and in the manner provided in this section. A declaratory
resolution previously adopted may include an allocation provision by
the amendment of that declaratory resolution in accordance with the
procedures set forth in section 13 of this chapter. The allocation
provision may apply to all or part of the military base reuse area. The
allocation provision must require that any property taxes subsequently
levied by or for the benefit of any public body entitled to a distribution
of property taxes on taxable property in the allocation area be allocated
and distributed as follows:
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the proceeds of
the taxes attributable to the lesser of:
(A) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date
with respect to which the allocation and distribution is made;
or
(B) the base assessed value;
shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into the funds of
the respective taxing units.
(2) The excess of the proceeds of the property taxes imposed for
the assessment date with respect to which the allocation and
distribution are made that are attributable to taxes imposed after
being approved by the voters in a referendum or local public
question conducted after April 30, 2010, not otherwise included
in subdivision (1) shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid
into the funds of the taxing unit for which the referendum or local
public question was conducted.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, property tax
proceeds in excess of those described in subdivisions (1) and (2)
shall be allocated to the military base reuse district and, when
collected, paid into an allocation fund for that allocation area that
may be used by the military base reuse district and only to do one
(1) or more of the following:
(A) Pay the principal of and interest and redemption premium
on any obligations incurred by the military base reuse district
or any other entity for the purpose of financing or refinancing
military base reuse activities in or directly serving or
benefiting that allocation area.
(B) Establish, augment, or restore the debt service reserve for
bonds payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in
that allocation area or from other revenues of the reuse
authority, including lease rental revenues.
(C) Make payments on leases payable solely or in part from
allocated tax proceeds in that allocation area.
(D) Reimburse any other governmental body for expenditures
made for local public improvements (or structures) in or
directly serving or benefiting that allocation area.
(E) Pay expenses incurred by the reuse authority, any other
department of the unit, or a department of another
governmental entity for local public improvements or
structures that are in the allocation area or directly serving or
benefiting the allocation area, including expenses for the
operation and maintenance of these local public improvements
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


or structures if the reuse authority determines those operation
and maintenance expenses are necessary or desirable to carry
out the purposes of this chapter.
(F) Reimburse public and private entities for expenses
incurred in training employees of industrial facilities that are
located:
(i) in the allocation area; and
(ii) on a parcel of real property that has been classified as
industrial property under the rules of the department of local
government finance.
However, the total amount of money spent for this purpose in
any year may not exceed the total amount of money in the
allocation fund that is attributable to property taxes paid by the
industrial facilities described in this clause. The
reimbursements under this clause must be made not more than
three (3) years after the date on which the investments that are
the basis for the increment financing are made.
(G) Expend money and provide financial assistance as
authorized in section 9(a)(25) of this chapter.
Except as provided in clause (E), the allocation fund may not be
used for operating expenses of the reuse authority.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (g), before July 15 of each
year the reuse authority shall do the following:
(A) Determine the amount, if any, by which property taxes
payable to the allocation fund in the following year will exceed
the amount of property taxes necessary to make, when due,
principal and interest payments on bonds described in
subdivision (3) plus the amount necessary for other purposes
described in subdivision (3).
(B) Provide a written notice to the county auditor, the fiscal
body of the unit that established the reuse authority, and the
officers who are authorized to fix budgets, tax rates, and tax
levies under IC 6-1.1-17-5 for each of the other taxing units
that is wholly or partly located within the allocation area. The
notice must:
(i) state the amount, if any, of excess property taxes that the
reuse authority has determined may be paid to the respective
taxing units in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1); or
(ii) state that the reuse authority has determined that there
are no excess property tax proceeds that may be allocated to
the respective taxing units in the manner prescribed in
subdivision (1).
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


The county auditor shall allocate to the respective taxing units
the amount, if any, of excess property tax proceeds determined
by the reuse authority. The reuse authority may not authorize
a payment to the respective taxing units under this subdivision
if to do so would endanger the interest of the holders of bonds
described in subdivision (3) or lessors under section 19 of this
chapter.
(c) For the purpose of allocating taxes levied by or for any taxing
unit or units, the assessed value of taxable property in a territory in the
allocation area that is annexed by a taxing unit after the effective date
of the allocation provision of the declaratory resolution is the lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date with
respect to which the allocation and distribution is made; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(d) Property tax proceeds allocable to the military base reuse district
under subsection (b)(3) may, subject to subsection (b)(4), be
irrevocably pledged by the military base reuse district for payment as
set forth in subsection (b)(3).
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, each assessor shall, upon
petition of the reuse authority, reassess the taxable property situated
upon or in or added to the allocation area, effective on the next
assessment date after the petition.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the assessed value of all taxable
property in the allocation area, for purposes of tax limitation, property
tax replacement, and the making of the budget, tax rate, and tax levy
for each political subdivision in which the property is located is the
lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property as valued without regard to
this section; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(g) If any part of the allocation area is located in an enterprise zone
created under IC 5-28-15, the unit that designated the allocation area
shall create funds as specified in this subsection. A unit that has
obligations, bonds, or leases payable from allocated tax proceeds under
subsection (b)(3) shall establish an allocation fund for the purposes
specified in subsection (b)(3) and a special zone fund. Such a unit
shall, until the end of the enterprise zone phase out period, deposit each
year in the special zone fund any amount in the allocation fund derived
from property tax proceeds in excess of those described in subsection
(b)(1) and (b)(2) from property located in the enterprise zone that
exceeds the amount sufficient for the purposes specified in subsection
(b)(3) for the year. The amount sufficient for purposes specified in
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


subsection (b)(3) for the year shall be determined based on the pro rata
part of such current property tax proceeds from the part of the
enterprise zone that is within the allocation area as compared to all
such current property tax proceeds derived from the allocation area. A
unit that does not have obligations, bonds, or leases payable from
allocated tax proceeds under subsection (b)(3) shall establish a special
zone fund and deposit all the property tax proceeds in excess of those
described in subsection (b)(1) and (b)(2) that are derived from property
in the enterprise zone in the fund. The unit that creates the special zone
fund shall use the fund (based on the recommendations of the urban
enterprise association) for programs in job training, job enrichment,
and basic skill development that are designed to benefit residents and
employers in the enterprise zone or other purposes specified in
subsection (b)(3), except that where reference is made in subsection
(b)(3) to allocation area it shall refer for purposes of payments from the
special zone fund only to that part of the allocation area that is also
located in the enterprise zone. The programs shall reserve at least
one-half (1/2) of their enrollment in any session for residents of the
enterprise zone.
(h) After each reassessment of real property in an area under the
county's reassessment plan under IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, the department of
local government finance shall adjust the base assessed value one (1)
time to neutralize any effect of the reassessment of the real property in
the area on the property tax proceeds allocated to the military base
reuse district under this section. After each annual adjustment under
IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, the department of local government finance shall adjust
the base assessed value to neutralize any effect of the annual
adjustment on the property tax proceeds allocated to the military base
reuse district under this section. However, the adjustments under this
subsection may not include the effect of property tax abatements under
IC 6-1.1-12.1, and these adjustments may not produce less property tax
proceeds allocable to the military base reuse district under subsection
(b)(3) than would otherwise have been received if the reassessment
under the county's reassessment plan or annual adjustment had not
occurred. The department of local government finance may prescribe
procedures for county and township officials to follow to assist the
department in making the adjustments. The department of local
government finance may require the reuse authority to submit
required documentation to neutralize the base assessed value. Any
supporting documentation the reuse authority is required to
submit to support the base assessed value neutralization
calculation must be completed and submitted to the department of
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


local government finance by July 15 of each year. If the reuse
authority does not submit the required documentation under this
subsection by the deadline described in this subsection in a given
year, then five percent (5%) of the excess assessed value shall be
allocated to the respective taxing units in the year the deadline
described in this subsection is missed.
(i) If the reuse authority adopts a declaratory resolution or an
amendment to a declaratory resolution that contains an allocation
provision and the reuse authority makes either of the filings required
under section 12(c) or 13(f) of this chapter after the first anniversary of
the effective date of the allocation provision, the auditor of the county
in which the military base reuse district is located shall compute the
base assessed value for the allocation area using the assessment date
immediately preceding the later of:
(1) the date on which the documents are filed with the county
auditor; or
(2) the date on which the documents are filed with the department
of local government finance.
(j) For an allocation area established after June 30, 2024,
"residential property" refers to the assessed value of property that is
allocated to the one percent (1%) homestead land and improvement
categories in the county tax and billing software system. along with the
residential assessed value as defined for purposes of calculating the
rate for the local income tax property tax relief credit designated for
residential property under IC 6-3.6-5-6(d)(3) (before its expiration).
SECTION 21. IC 36-7-30-25.2, AS ADDED BY P.L.123-2024,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 25.2. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if the
Indiana economic development corporation subsequently designates
territory that is located in an existing allocation area under this chapter
as an innovation development district under IC 36-7-32.5, the
allocation area may not be renewed or extended under this chapter until
the term of the innovation development district expires.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, for taxing districts that
include multiple tax increment financing districts under this
chapter, the original tax increment financing district does not
expire and stays active only for the purpose of satisfying
outstanding bonds issued by the subsequent tax increment
financing district, only if the reuse authority completes the
following requirements:
(1) Provides a written appeal to and receives the approval of
the department of local government finance.
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(2) Provides written notice to the state board of accounts of
the appeal.
SECTION 22. IC 36-7-30-26.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.249-2015,
SECTION 29, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26.5. (a) A reuse authority may enter into a
written agreement with a taxpayer who owns, or is otherwise obligated
to pay property taxes on, tangible property that is or will be located in
an allocation area established under this chapter in which the taxpayer
waives review of any assessment of the taxpayer's tangible property
that is located in the allocation area for an assessment date that occurs
during the term of any specified bond or lease obligations that are
payable from property taxes in accordance with an allocation provision
for the allocation area and any applicable statute, ordinance, or
resolution. An agreement described in this section may precede the
establishment of the allocation area or the determination to issue bonds
or enter into leases payable from the allocated property taxes.
(b) The original owner of each nonowner-occupied residential
property subject to the two percent (2%) tax cap, that is located in
the tax increment financing area and is excluded from the base
assessed value, shall upon completion of construction enter into a
written agreement with the reuse authority indicating the owner
shall be obligated to pay the property tax for the portion of
outstanding bonds in the tax increment financing district
attributable to the property until the term length of the original
outstanding bond is retired. The written agreement with the reuse
authority shall be considered a lien on the property and shall be
included as part of the residential real estate sales disclosure under
IC 32-21-5. If the property is subsequently sold as a homestead
property and becomes subject to the one percent (1%) tax cap, the
new owner shall be responsible for the lien on the property
attributable to the written agreement with the reuse authority, and
the new homestead property owner shall be obligated to fulfill the
terms of the written agreement including the payment of the
property tax liability included in the agreement.
SECTION 23. IC 36-7-30.5-30, AS AMENDED BY P.L.174-2022,
SECTION 75, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 30. (a) The following definitions apply throughout
this section:
(1) "Allocation area" means that part of a military base
development area to which an allocation provision of a
declaratory resolution adopted under section 16 of this chapter
refers for purposes of distribution and allocation of property taxes.
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(2) "Base assessed value" means, subject to subsection (i):
(A) the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
adoption date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(B) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A) or (C), the
net assessed value of any and all parcels or classes of parcels
identified as part of the base assessed value in the declaratory
resolution or an amendment to the declaratory resolution, as
finally determined for any subsequent assessment date; plus
(C) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A) or (B), the
net assessed value of property that is assessed as residential
property under the rules of the department of local government
finance, within the allocation area, as finally determined for
the current assessment date.
(3) "Property taxes" means taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on real
property.
(b) A declaratory resolution adopted under section 16 of this chapter
before the date set forth in IC 36-7-14-39(b) pertaining to declaratory
resolutions adopted under IC 36-7-14-15 may include a provision with
respect to the allocation and distribution of property taxes for the
purposes and in the manner provided in this section. A declaratory
resolution previously adopted may include an allocation provision by
the amendment of that declaratory resolution in accordance with the
procedures set forth in section 18 of this chapter. The allocation
provision may apply to all or part of the military base development
area. The allocation provision must require that any property taxes
subsequently levied by or for the benefit of any public body entitled to
a distribution of property taxes on taxable property in the allocation
area be allocated and distributed as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the proceeds of
the taxes attributable to the lesser of:
(A) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date
with respect to which the allocation and distribution is made;
or
(B) the base assessed value;
shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into the funds of
the respective taxing units.
(2) The excess of the proceeds of the property taxes imposed for
the assessment date with respect to which the allocation and
distribution is made that are attributable to taxes imposed after
being approved by the voters in a referendum or local public
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


question conducted after April 30, 2010, not otherwise included
in subdivision (1) shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid
into the funds of the taxing unit for which the referendum or local
public question was conducted.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, property tax
proceeds in excess of those described in subdivisions (1) and (2)
shall be allocated to the development authority and, when
collected, paid into an allocation fund for that allocation area that
may be used by the development authority and only to do one (1)
or more of the following:
(A) Pay the principal of and interest and redemption premium
on any obligations incurred by the development authority or
any other entity for the purpose of financing or refinancing
military base development or reuse activities in or directly
serving or benefiting that allocation area.
(B) Establish, augment, or restore the debt service reserve for
bonds payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in
that allocation area or from other revenues of the development
authority, including lease rental revenues.
(C) Make payments on leases payable solely or in part from
allocated tax proceeds in that allocation area.
(D) Reimburse any other governmental body for expenditures
made for local public improvements (or structures) in or
directly serving or benefiting that allocation area.
(E) For property taxes first due and payable before 2009, pay
all or a part of a property tax replacement credit to taxpayers
in an allocation area as determined by the development
authority. This credit equals the amount determined under the
following STEPS for each taxpayer in a taxing district (as
defined in IC 6-1.1-1-20) that contains all or part of the
allocation area:
STEP ONE: Determine that part of the sum of the amounts
under IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(1)(A), IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(2),
IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(3), IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(4), and
IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(5) (before their repeal) that is attributable to
the taxing district.
STEP TWO: Divide:
(i) that part of each county's eligible property tax
replacement amount (as defined in IC 6-1.1-21-2 (before its
repeal)) for that year as determined under IC 6-1.1-21-4
(before its repeal) that is attributable to the taxing district;
by
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(ii) the STEP ONE sum.
STEP THREE: Multiply:
(i) the STEP TWO quotient; by
(ii) the total amount of the taxpayer's taxes (as defined in
IC 6-1.1-21-2 (before its repeal)) levied in the taxing district
that have been allocated during that year to an allocation
fund under this section.
If not all the taxpayers in an allocation area receive the credit
in full, each taxpayer in the allocation area is entitled to
receive the same proportion of the credit. A taxpayer may not
receive a credit under this section and a credit under section
32 of this chapter (before its repeal) in the same year.
(F) Pay expenses incurred by the development authority for
local public improvements or structures that were in the
allocation area or directly serving or benefiting the allocation
area.
(G) Reimburse public and private entities for expenses
incurred in training employees of industrial facilities that are
located:
(i) in the allocation area; and
(ii) on a parcel of real property that has been classified as
industrial property under the rules of the department of local
government finance.
However, the total amount of money spent for this purpose in
any year may not exceed the total amount of money in the
allocation fund that is attributable to property taxes paid by the
industrial facilities described in this clause. The
reimbursements under this clause must be made not more than
three (3) years after the date on which the investments that are
the basis for the increment financing are made.
(H) Expend money and provide financial assistance as
authorized in section 15(26) of this chapter.
The allocation fund may not be used for operating expenses of the
development authority.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (g), before July 15 of each
year the development authority shall do the following:
(A) Determine the amount, if any, by which property taxes
payable to the allocation fund in the following year will exceed
the amount of property taxes necessary to make, when due,
principal and interest payments on bonds described in
subdivision (3) plus the amount necessary for other purposes
described in subdivisions (2) and (3).
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(B) Provide a written notice to the appropriate county auditors
and the fiscal bodies and other officers who are authorized to
fix budgets, tax rates, and tax levies under IC 6-1.1-17-5 for
each of the other taxing units that is wholly or partly located
within the allocation area. The notice must:
(i) state the amount, if any, of the excess property taxes that
the development authority has determined may be paid to
the respective taxing units in the manner prescribed in
subdivision (1); or
(ii) state that the development authority has determined that
there is no excess assessed value that may be allocated to the
respective taxing units in the manner prescribed in
subdivision (1).
The county auditors shall allocate to the respective taxing units
the amount, if any, of excess assessed value determined by the
development authority. The development authority may not
authorize a payment to the respective taxing units under this
subdivision if to do so would endanger the interest of the
holders of bonds described in subdivision (3) or lessors under
section 24 of this chapter. Property taxes received by a taxing
unit under this subdivision before 2009 are eligible for the
property tax replacement credit provided under IC 6-1.1-21
(before its repeal).
(c) For the purpose of allocating taxes levied by or for any taxing
unit or units, the assessed value of taxable property in a territory in the
allocation area that is annexed by a taxing unit after the effective date
of the allocation provision of the declaratory resolution is the lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date with
respect to which the allocation and distribution is made; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(d) Property tax proceeds allocable to the military base development
district under subsection (b)(3) may, subject to subsection (b)(4), be
irrevocably pledged by the military base development district for
payment as set forth in subsection (b)(3).
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, each assessor shall, upon
petition of the development authority, reassess the taxable property
situated upon or in or added to the allocation area, effective on the next
assessment date after the petition.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the assessed value of all taxable
property in the allocation area, for purposes of tax limitation, property
tax replacement, and the making of the budget, tax rate, and tax levy
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


for each political subdivision in which the property is located is the
lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property as valued without regard to
this section; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(g) If any part of the allocation area is located in an enterprise zone
created under IC 5-28-15, the development authority shall create funds
as specified in this subsection. A development authority that has
obligations, bonds, or leases payable from allocated tax proceeds under
subsection (b)(3) shall establish an allocation fund for the purposes
specified in subsection (b)(3) and a special zone fund. The
development authority shall, until the end of the enterprise zone phase
out period, deposit each year in the special zone fund any amount in the
allocation fund derived from property tax proceeds in excess of those
described in subsection (b)(1) and (b)(2) from property located in the
enterprise zone that exceeds the amount sufficient for the purposes
specified in subsection (b)(3) for the year. The amount sufficient for
purposes specified in subsection (b)(3) for the year shall be determined
based on the pro rata part of such current property tax proceeds from
the part of the enterprise zone that is within the allocation area as
compared to all such current property tax proceeds derived from the
allocation area. A development authority that does not have
obligations, bonds, or leases payable from allocated tax proceeds under
subsection (b)(3) shall establish a special zone fund and deposit all the
property tax proceeds in excess of those described in subsection (b)(1)
and (b)(2) that are derived from property in the enterprise zone in the
fund. The development authority that creates the special zone fund
shall use the fund (based on the recommendations of the urban
enterprise association) for programs in job training, job enrichment,
and basic skill development that are designed to benefit residents and
employers in the enterprise zone or for other purposes specified in
subsection (b)(3), except that where reference is made in subsection
(b)(3) to an allocation area it shall refer for purposes of payments from
the special zone fund only to that part of the allocation area that is also
located in the enterprise zone. The programs shall reserve at least
one-half (1/2) of their enrollment in any session for residents of the
enterprise zone.
(h) After each reassessment of real property in an area under a
reassessment plan prepared under IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, the department of
local government finance shall adjust the base assessed value one (1)
time to neutralize any effect of the reassessment of the real property in
the area on the property tax proceeds allocated to the military base
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


development district under this section. After each annual adjustment
under IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, the department of local government finance shall
adjust the base assessed value to neutralize any effect of the annual
adjustment on the property tax proceeds allocated to the military base
development district under this section. However, the adjustments
under this subsection may not include the effect of property tax
abatements under IC 6-1.1-12.1, and these adjustments may not
produce less property tax proceeds allocable to the military base
development district under subsection (b)(3) than would otherwise
have been received if the reassessment under the county's reassessment
plan or annual adjustment had not occurred. The department of local
government finance may prescribe procedures for county and township
officials to follow to assist the department in making the adjustments.
The department of local government finance may require the
development authority to submit required documentation to
neutralize the base assessed value. Any supporting documentation
the development authority is required to submit to support the
base assessed value neutralization calculation must be completed
and submitted to the department of local government finance by
July 15 of each year. If the development authority does not submit
the required documentation under this subsection by the deadline
described in this subsection in a given year, then five percent (5%)
of the excess assessed value shall be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the year the deadline described in this subsection is
missed.
(i) If the development authority adopts a declaratory resolution or
an amendment to a declaratory resolution that contains an allocation
provision and the development authority makes either of the filings
required under section 17(e) or 18(f) of this chapter after the first
anniversary of the effective date of the allocation provision, the auditor
of the county in which the military base development district is located
shall compute the base assessed value for the allocation area using the
assessment date immediately preceding the later of:
(1) the date on which the documents are filed with the county
auditor; or
(2) the date on which the documents are filed with the department
of local government finance.
(j) For an allocation area established after June 30, 2024,
"residential property" refers to the assessed value of property that is
allocated to the one percent (1%) homestead land and improvement
categories in the county tax and billing software system. along with the
residential assessed value as defined for purposes of calculating the
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


rate for the local income tax property tax relief credit designated for
residential property under IC 6-3.6-5-6(d)(3).
SECTION 24. IC 36-7-30.5-30, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 238, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 30. (a) The following definitions
apply throughout this section:
(1) "Allocation area" means that part of a military base
development area to which an allocation provision of a
declaratory resolution adopted under section 16 of this chapter
refers for purposes of distribution and allocation of property taxes.
(2) "Base assessed value" means, subject to subsection (i):
(A) the net assessed value of all the property as finally
determined for the assessment date immediately preceding the
adoption date of the allocation provision of the declaratory
resolution, as adjusted under subsection (h); plus
(B) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A) or (C), the
net assessed value of any and all parcels or classes of parcels
identified as part of the base assessed value in the declaratory
resolution or an amendment to the declaratory resolution, as
finally determined for any subsequent assessment date; plus
(C) to the extent that it is not included in clause (A) or (B), the
net assessed value of property that is assessed as residential
property under the rules of the department of local government
finance, within the allocation area, as finally determined for
the current assessment date.
(3) "Property taxes" means taxes imposed under IC 6-1.1 on real
property.
(b) A declaratory resolution adopted under section 16 of this chapter
before the date set forth in IC 36-7-14-39(b) pertaining to declaratory
resolutions adopted under IC 36-7-14-15 may include a provision with
respect to the allocation and distribution of property taxes for the
purposes and in the manner provided in this section. A declaratory
resolution previously adopted may include an allocation provision by
the amendment of that declaratory resolution in accordance with the
procedures set forth in section 18 of this chapter. The allocation
provision may apply to all or part of the military base development
area. The allocation provision must require that any property taxes
subsequently levied by or for the benefit of any public body entitled to
a distribution of property taxes on taxable property in the allocation
area be allocated and distributed as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the proceeds of
the taxes attributable to the lesser of:
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(A) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date
with respect to which the allocation and distribution is made;
or
(B) the base assessed value;
shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into the funds of
the respective taxing units.
(2) The excess of the proceeds of the property taxes imposed for
the assessment date with respect to which the allocation and
distribution is made that are attributable to taxes imposed after
being approved by the voters in a referendum or local public
question conducted after April 30, 2010, not otherwise included
in subdivision (1) shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid
into the funds of the taxing unit for which the referendum or local
public question was conducted.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, property tax
proceeds in excess of those described in subdivisions (1) and (2)
shall be allocated to the development authority and, when
collected, paid into an allocation fund for that allocation area that
may be used by the development authority and only to do one (1)
or more of the following:
(A) Pay the principal of and interest and redemption premium
on any obligations incurred by the development authority or
any other entity for the purpose of financing or refinancing
military base development or reuse activities in or directly
serving or benefiting that allocation area.
(B) Establish, augment, or restore the debt service reserve for
bonds payable solely or in part from allocated tax proceeds in
that allocation area or from other revenues of the development
authority, including lease rental revenues.
(C) Make payments on leases payable solely or in part from
allocated tax proceeds in that allocation area.
(D) Reimburse any other governmental body for expenditures
made for local public improvements (or structures) in or
directly serving or benefiting that allocation area.
(E) For property taxes first due and payable before 2009, pay
all or a part of a property tax replacement credit to taxpayers
in an allocation area as determined by the development
authority. This credit equals the amount determined under the
following STEPS for each taxpayer in a taxing district (as
defined in IC 6-1.1-1-20) that contains all or part of the
allocation area:
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


STEP ONE: Determine that part of the sum of the amounts
under IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(1)(A), IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(2),
IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(3), IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(4), and
IC 6-1.1-21-2(g)(5) (before their repeal) that is attributable to
the taxing district.
STEP TWO: Divide:
(i) that part of each county's eligible property tax
replacement amount (as defined in IC 6-1.1-21-2 (before its
repeal)) for that year as determined under IC 6-1.1-21-4
(before its repeal) that is attributable to the taxing district;
by
(ii) the STEP ONE sum.
STEP THREE: Multiply:
(i) the STEP TWO quotient; by
(ii) the total amount of the taxpayer's taxes (as defined in
IC 6-1.1-21-2 (before its repeal)) levied in the taxing district
that have been allocated during that year to an allocation
fund under this section.
If not all the taxpayers in an allocation area receive the credit
in full, each taxpayer in the allocation area is entitled to
receive the same proportion of the credit. A taxpayer may not
receive a credit under this section and a credit under section
32 of this chapter (before its repeal) in the same year.
(F) Pay expenses incurred by the development authority for
local public improvements or structures that were in the
allocation area or directly serving or benefiting the allocation
area.
(G) Reimburse public and private entities for expenses
incurred in training employees of industrial facilities that are
located:
(i) in the allocation area; and
(ii) on a parcel of real property that has been classified as
industrial property under the rules of the department of local
government finance.
However, the total amount of money spent for this purpose in
any year may not exceed the total amount of money in the
allocation fund that is attributable to property taxes paid by the
industrial facilities described in this clause. The
reimbursements under this clause must be made not more than
three (3) years after the date on which the investments that are
the basis for the increment financing are made.
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(H) Expend money and provide financial assistance as
authorized in section 15(26) of this chapter.
The allocation fund may not be used for operating expenses of the
development authority.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (g), before July 15 of each
year the development authority shall do the following:
(A) Determine the amount, if any, by which property taxes
payable to the allocation fund in the following year will exceed
the amount of property taxes necessary to make, when due,
principal and interest payments on bonds described in
subdivision (3) plus the amount necessary for other purposes
described in subdivisions (2) and (3).
(B) Provide a written notice to the appropriate county auditors
and the fiscal bodies and other officers who are authorized to
fix budgets, tax rates, and tax levies under IC 6-1.1-17-5 for
each of the other taxing units that is wholly or partly located
within the allocation area. The notice must:
(i) state the amount, if any, of the excess property taxes that
the development authority has determined may be paid to
the respective taxing units in the manner prescribed in
subdivision (1); or
(ii) state that the development authority has determined that
there is no excess assessed value that may be allocated to the
respective taxing units in the manner prescribed in
subdivision (1).
The county auditors shall allocate to the respective taxing units
the amount, if any, of excess assessed value determined by the
development authority. The development authority may not
authorize a payment to the respective taxing units under this
subdivision if to do so would endanger the interest of the
holders of bonds described in subdivision (3) or lessors under
section 24 of this chapter. Property taxes received by a taxing
unit under this subdivision before 2009 are eligible for the
property tax replacement credit provided under IC 6-1.1-21
(before its repeal).
(c) For the purpose of allocating taxes levied by or for any taxing
unit or units, the assessed value of taxable property in a territory in the
allocation area that is annexed by a taxing unit after the effective date
of the allocation provision of the declaratory resolution is the lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property for the assessment date with
respect to which the allocation and distribution is made; or
(2) the base assessed value.
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


(d) Property tax proceeds allocable to the military base development
district under subsection (b)(3) may, subject to subsection (b)(4), be
irrevocably pledged by the military base development district for
payment as set forth in subsection (b)(3).
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, each assessor shall, upon
petition of the development authority, reassess the taxable property
situated upon or in or added to the allocation area, effective on the next
assessment date after the petition.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, the assessed value of all taxable
property in the allocation area, for purposes of tax limitation, property
tax replacement, and the making of the budget, tax rate, and tax levy
for each political subdivision in which the property is located is the
lesser of:
(1) the assessed value of the property as valued without regard to
this section; or
(2) the base assessed value.
(g) If any part of the allocation area is located in an enterprise zone
created under IC 5-28-15, the development authority shall create funds
as specified in this subsection. A development authority that has
obligations, bonds, or leases payable from allocated tax proceeds under
subsection (b)(3) shall establish an allocation fund for the purposes
specified in subsection (b)(3) and a special zone fund. The
development authority shall, until the end of the enterprise zone phase
out period, deposit each year in the special zone fund any amount in the
allocation fund derived from property tax proceeds in excess of those
described in subsection (b)(1) and (b)(2) from property located in the
enterprise zone that exceeds the amount sufficient for the purposes
specified in subsection (b)(3) for the year. The amount sufficient for
purposes specified in subsection (b)(3) for the year shall be determined
based on the pro rata part of such current property tax proceeds from
the part of the enterprise zone that is within the allocation area as
compared to all such current property tax proceeds derived from the
allocation area. A development authority that does not have
obligations, bonds, or leases payable from allocated tax proceeds under
subsection (b)(3) shall establish a special zone fund and deposit all the
property tax proceeds in excess of those described in subsection (b)(1)
and (b)(2) that are derived from property in the enterprise zone in the
fund. The development authority that creates the special zone fund
shall use the fund (based on the recommendations of the urban
enterprise association) for programs in job training, job enrichment,
and basic skill development that are designed to benefit residents and
employers in the enterprise zone or for other purposes specified in
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


subsection (b)(3), except that where reference is made in subsection
(b)(3) to an allocation area it shall refer for purposes of payments from
the special zone fund only to that part of the allocation area that is also
located in the enterprise zone. The programs shall reserve at least
one-half (1/2) of their enrollment in any session for residents of the
enterprise zone.
(h) After each reassessment of real property in an area under a
reassessment plan prepared under IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, the department of
local government finance shall adjust the base assessed value one (1)
time to neutralize any effect of the reassessment of the real property in
the area on the property tax proceeds allocated to the military base
development district under this section. After each annual adjustment
under IC 6-1.1-4-4.5, the department of local government finance shall
adjust the base assessed value to neutralize any effect of the annual
adjustment on the property tax proceeds allocated to the military base
development district under this section. However, the adjustments
under this subsection may not include the effect of property tax
abatements under IC 6-1.1-12.1, and these adjustments may not
produce less property tax proceeds allocable to the military base
development district under subsection (b)(3) than would otherwise
have been received if the reassessment under the county's reassessment
plan or annual adjustment had not occurred. The department of local
government finance may prescribe procedures for county and township
officials to follow to assist the department in making the adjustments.
The department of local government finance may require the
development authority to submit required documentation to
neutralize the base assessed value. Any supporting documentation
the development authority is required to submit to support the
base assessed value neutralization calculation must be completed
and submitted to the department of local government finance by
July 15 of each year. If the development authority does not submit
the required documentation under this subsection by the deadline
described in this subsection in a given year, then five percent (5%)
of the excess assessed value shall be allocated to the respective
taxing units in the year the deadline described in this subsection is
missed.
(i) If the development authority adopts a declaratory resolution or
an amendment to a declaratory resolution that contains an allocation
provision and the development authority makes either of the filings
required under section 17(e) or 18(f) of this chapter after the first
anniversary of the effective date of the allocation provision, the auditor
of the county in which the military base development district is located
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


shall compute the base assessed value for the allocation area using the
assessment date immediately preceding the later of:
(1) the date on which the documents are filed with the county
auditor; or
(2) the date on which the documents are filed with the department
of local government finance.
(j) For an allocation area established after June 30, 2024,
"residential property" refers to the assessed value of property that is
allocated to the one percent (1%) homestead land and improvement
categories in the county tax and billing software system. along with the
residential assessed value as defined for purposes of calculating the
rate for the local income tax property tax relief credit designated for
residential property under IC 6-3.6-5-6(d)(3) (before its expiration).
SECTION 25. IC 36-7-30.5-30.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.123-2024,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 30.3. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if the
Indiana economic development corporation subsequently designates
territory that is located in an existing allocation area under this chapter
as an innovation development district under IC 36-7-32.5, the
allocation area may not be renewed or extended under this chapter until
the term of the innovation development district expires.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, for taxing districts that
include multiple tax increment financing districts under this
chapter, the original tax increment financing district does not
expire and stays active only for the purpose of satisfying
outstanding bonds issued by the subsequent tax increment
financing district, only if the development authority completes the
following requirements:
(1) Provides a written appeal to and receives the approval of
the department of local government finance.
(2) Provides written notice to the state board of accounts of
the appeal.
SECTION 26. IC 36-7-30.5-31.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.249-2015,
SECTION 30, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 31.5. (a) The development authority may enter
into a written agreement with a taxpayer who owns, or is otherwise
obligated to pay property taxes on, tangible property that is or will be
located in an allocation area established under this chapter in which the
taxpayer waives review of any assessment of the taxpayer's tangible
property that is located in the allocation area for an assessment date
that occurs during the term of any specified bond or lease obligations
that are payable from property taxes in accordance with an allocation
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134


provision for the allocation area and any applicable statute, ordinance,
or resolution. An agreement described in this section may precede the
establishment of the allocation area or the determination to issue bonds
or enter into leases payable from the allocated property taxes.
(b) The original owner of each nonowner-occupied residential
property subject to the two percent (2%) tax cap, that is located in
the tax increment financing area and is excluded from the base
assessed value, shall upon completion of construction enter into a
written agreement with the development authority indicating the
owner shall be obligated to pay the property tax for the portion of
outstanding bonds in the tax increment financing district
attributable to the property until the term length of the original
outstanding bond is retired. The written agreement with the
development authority shall be considered a lien on the property
and shall be included as part of the residential real estate sales
disclosure under IC 32-21-5. If the property is subsequently sold as
a homestead property and becomes subject to the one percent (1%)
tax cap, the new owner shall be responsible for the lien on the
property attributable to the written agreement with the
development authority, and the new homestead property owner
shall be obligated to fulfill the terms of the written agreement
including the payment of the property tax liability included in the
agreement.
2026 IN 278—LS 7069/DI 134